It's minimalist anime.
I definatley got a "Call to Power" vibe from it, especially the church parts. I don't care what anyone else says, that game was awesome =|
if i do that repeatedly, it differs by (word size * 2**20), as expected. it *does* do some unknown allocation and doesn't grow back though. i know python keeps numbers upto ~120 around so that identity is true, but i don't know what else it does that might produce the overhead. the overhead here is 3 times the word size per element (in addition to the array which is 1 word size per element). edit: these 3 words (32 bit on my box) could be the integer value itself plus some class data for int types... i think python does produce all numbers, then keeps them around. i'm not sure though... well, there's the array module :)
Maybe they'll pay your debts?  Or maybe you enjoy living in your cabin in the woods writing your "Fuck Off Assholes" manifesto to the world.
http://phoenix.cox.net/cci/google?term=site:www.remotecontrolwarehouse.com
Full penetration, eh? No doubt this will lead to a climactic cultural shift.   
I really couldn't buy that Randy Marsh doing the things he does in the show =)
stupid
Yes, I think it's a shame how apparently one-sided the health care debate has been in the US. As Moore points out, the term "socialized medicine" (or really, "socialized" anything) is a dirty word and is wielded as a blunt conversation ender. In discussion threads all over the internet I'm seeing people argue over and over that "we can't use a socialized system because it's inefficient." I have no evidence for this, but I would not be shocked if many of these people are middle- to low-income earners, and were effectively fighting against their best interests, but don't realize it because the word "socialized" is so taboo, and they have been lead for so long to believe that government-run anything automatically sucks. Maybe if your government held off on building a new nuclear-powered aircraft carrier or two, more Americans could afford to see a doctor. I know that's a simplistic argument, but sometimes the priorities of the US are confusing to those of us looking in from the outside.
Wow, and just 500 years ago. I guess that's plate tectonics for ya
Nobody pays for my debts but myself and nobody else should have to.
Neither are the police.
Didn't Fudd eventually step over a cliff?
Do you add the stuff there yourself everyday (would seem time consuming!) or do you have some sort of automated content grabber?  Forgive me if that's a dumb question. I was a web designer in the old days of "&lt;table&gt;&lt;tr&gt;&lt;td&gt;" and don't understand most of the web2.0 stuff...  Gore talks a lot about independent, internet-driven television as what will replace network tv, so it's interesting to me.
And just in time for the '08 elections, they suddenly 'find' Osama after a long and difficult mission through dangerous territory. ...the truth being he was found long ago and locked up until a PR boost was needed. I'd bet a hundred bucks this comes true!
Interesting statistics. Do you remember the source?
&gt;How these monks could be considered Buddhist, I have no idea. Well, strictly speaking they weren't.  Shugendo is more of an amalgamation of Buddhism and [Shinto](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shinto), though it is in many ways distinct from both.  Calling is Buddhism is akin to calling Tibetan Buddhism "Hinduism."
Your user name is so correct.
Again, I repeat, this isn't a liberal vs. conservative issue. I think candidates on either side should get free airtime. I believe money does nothing but cloud the political process, because in a democracy, you shouldn't be more powerful if you have money. One man, one vote right?
Next time just give us a link if you're going to recite the party line.
Are those anything like dingleberries?  they just don't sound pleasant.
Okay, 100/100 is unfounded, but the fact remains that chess programs can be improved simply by throwing more computer at them. We can afford to throw far more computer at the problem now than we could in the days of Deep Blue/Kasparov; hell, we can even make special-purpose chess hardware running on FPGAs with practically nil investment. The HYDRA computer running in Israel can search to 18 moves, compared with Deep Blue's 12. That should be enough to comfortably beat any human in any winnable game; if not, we can just add more processors and try again. The problem with games like Go, and to some extent poker, is there there still isn't any plausible theory of how a winning computer might be built. Chess is solved but for the grunt work; Go isn't.
Your link has nothing to do with what I'm talking about. Nixonrichard's point makes sense, but your link is just going on and on about how polygamy is illegal. I'm not debating that. I just didn't see how it would be illegal to have legally single parents living with a legally married couple. Your link says nothing about that.
Deh... It's closer to having a Norman Rockwell feeling (or perhaps 'intent' is the better word) than Anime.  But some things definetly inspired by anime (eyebrows).   By the way, Kenny's mom is hot, I'd totally do her.
Because people are idiots.   
Take note of the verb in the title: understands, not advocates.
Their fucking business model is to make money and *not* be evil.  The fact that they are once again being evil to gain profit is going against that (which is even in their corporate charter or whatever it's called).  I'm surprised no Google shareholders have sued Google for not following their own corporate guidelines (which is their main rule other than follow the law and make money).
Coleman looks like the biggest pothead of all-time in this picture.
A freaking HUNDRED and eighty?! The bit about the pill is spot-on, timoleon.
Hmmm. Remarks like yours (and mine) are being dowmodded wihtout comment. I wonder why? For this particular type of FGM (but not other types), you are right. It would be interesting to read what people actually think of suchs comments, from a rational or factual perspective.
I always think it's darkly humorous when news programs or journals try to assert that they are objective. Guess what? If you have a view point or an opinion *at all*, you are not objective. The only way to be completely "objective" is to live in a cave with your ears and your eyes closed, and have never been raised in any kind of environment, in which case you won't be much of a journalist anyway.
That quote from Guliani is some mind-blowing double speak.
&gt; They have committed solicitation of a minor. No, they haven't.  That's the whole point.  No minor was solicited at any time. &gt; Had they not been mistaken in their attempt there is little reason to believe that they would not have carried through. Many people "chicken out" or have pangs of conscience which prevent them from actually going through with something they believe to be wrong.  That is very common, so we don't know which of them would actually do it in a real situation.  Maybe they wouldn't have found most real minors attractive, upon meeting -- I assume even *they* have some kind of standard of attractiveness and wouldn't want ugly/fat kids, for example.  Anyone who has met someone online knows whatever you "intend" can go right out the window when you actually meet them. But that's beside the point, as even if they had intended to carry through, there was nobody to carry through *with*, and hence, no victim. &gt; They're inchoate crime is attempting to molest said minors.  What minors?  There weren't any.  They can't *actually* molest someone who doesn't exist, so they can't *attempt* to do so, either. 
Not really.  If it is just pictures and there is no context, 99% of the time it is blogspam.  If it is blogspot, 99.99999% of the time it is blogspam.
LOL! Thanks for the link. It's nice to see some inventive church slogans for once. (not many around here)
I agree 100%.   This guy is an ass. I'm an Asian female, and I have a rather poor view of certain types of Asian men.  To preface what I'm about to say next, I do know very gentlemanly, upstanding Asian men who take care of their women and their family, for example my uncle.  I also know some successful white female / Asian male married couples.  However, some Asian men (particularly born in Asia) are incredibly sexist and backwards, and believe that women are inherently inferior to men.  See modern examples such as the abandoning of female babies in China. My father is the perfect example of such Asian men.  He was incredibly misogynist.  He said that I was really ugly as a baby, and that he wanted a son to carry on his name. So he blamed my mother for having a girl even though the male contributes the Y chromosome (oh and he's a doctor, so he should have known better).  He used my mother's family's money for his own personal gains then dumped her when it was convenient for him.  He verbally abused my mother throughout the years, and physically abused her many times. My mother landed in the hospital in America for wounds to her head, and she had to lie about it to keep him out of trouble (I mean prison).  She had an abortion while going through divorce proceedings (which he insisted on having in China for their lenient divorce laws -- i.e. no alimony, no child support).  Ironically according to the sonograms, she would have given birth to a son. My mother was a very beautiful Asian woman in her youth and had her pick of men, but my sociopath of a father got his hands on her.  Of course he thought of himself as a suave romantic who could woo any attractive woman he wanted (just like the guy who wrote this article).  He remarried a Chinese woman who is a lot younger, and to this day I've never known him to willingly spent more than a month's worth of paycheck total on his firstborn daughter (that's me).  I shudder to even carry on his genes, and if I have a son, I'm going to set him straight on *respecting* women. As far as this guy's stupid viewpoint of American females go -- I have met more than my share of tender, sweet, beautiful girls in America who are incredibly feminine, intelligent and possess a great deal of personal depth.  These girls would not look at *creeps* like the guy who wrote the article or my father twice.  Such men prey on women who believe they have no personal worth outside of their physical appearance, and who will meekly submit to any man that compliments them and displays a bit of wealth. In conclusion, stay away from men who refuse to acknowledge that women can be a man's equal, who cannot see the inner beauty that exist within the amazing women here, and who are so focused on outward appearances and insisting on all women putting out all the time that they mistake the world as a giant "meet them, use them and dump them" club, rather than a world where most great women are already involved with great men, and would not give such creeps a second of their day. In short, STFU whiny Asian misogynist who wrote a long, retarded ego-wanking book on how he is a complete failure.
The real "breakthrough" is thinking of the video frame more as a function that lazily generates only the necessary pixels, rather than a series of other videos manipulated together and then downsampled. In this case, too much data is generated in that first step to deal with. "A function that lazily generates only the needed pixels?" Sounds like a raytracer, doesn't it? It may have a few extra concepts but it's easy to ignore them, if you work with an orthogonal projection. POVRay may have been just as easy... not sure how far the scripting abilities have progressed, but as long as you can change textures dynamically over time somehow you'd be set. (Been a long times since I did anything in POVRay.) Re-inventing the raytracer, only less so, and calling it new... yup, it's a Wolfram. (Yeah, it's not actually by him, but I guess his influence is still felt...)
good god, get a hold of yourself, man.
No way! Finnish girls are amazing! As are American girls. Just girls. Girls everywhere. The author of this article is the douchiest looking guy I've seen in a while. Notice the same shirt in Mexico!
Polyandry was common in [Tibet](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Polyandry_in_Tibet).
Sure it is. Anyone who goes on nationwide TV and airs their dirty laundry is inviting everyone into their business.
Does Axiominfo also provide Spam outsourcing?
Now it would be *really* funny if he firebombed one of those fake abortion clinics run by fundy Christians.
What the fuck was a 66 year old man doing looking at baby books on ebay in the first place?
Terribly bad blog post but the entry is worth it because of this comment alone.
No, I actually hadn't seen that, and I didn't know a lot of the stuff in that article. Thanks.
Check out [this WorldNutDaily story](http://www.worldnetdaily.com/news/article.asp?ARTICLE_ID=16807), whose heading actually tries to pin the 1967-1977 MK Ultra Project on -- rimshot -- *Bill Clinton*.   
RTFA. "Mack said he was notified that his childhood momento was on the popular Internet auction site by his first cousin, Susan Sweet."
Is it OK to hate google yet?  Or are we still putting all of our hate into Microsoft still?
There's one street in London where you can see a lady walking around with no corset. And one of her ankles is visible.
You asked if what this family is doing is illegal. The answer is yes, it is illegal in Utah. He doesn't have to legally marry the other women to break the law. Just having children by multiple women and living in the same home is illegal co-habitation. It's not "just taboo" as you suggested.
That is the politically correct tale they want you to believe.
User ID and Password for Xee Telugu channel please.  Not found working when clicked.  Thanks.
It was before the sphere was invented, Mr. President.
What an odd thing to sell on eBay. I guess there really is a market for anything, including other people's baby books.
The high science came in discovering that the dumber you made the computer, the better it played, due to being able to examine more ply because it wasn't wasting time trying to be smart.  That is a pretty significant discover, IMO, and took a few decades to learn.
one-more-turn
Oh, there is a market for much weirder stuff than other people's baby books.
Its actually a  good idea because it encourages kids to stay in the area and contribute to Maine's economy... For example in Iowa or Kansas there is no income tax for residents under 30.  This is to encourage people to move there and put down roots.   With college debt being paid off, you get people moving in, marrying, settling, establishing themselves and becoming tax paying citizens..  It is to mitigate the New York, Los Angeles, Chicago, San Francisco effect.. Recent doctors get similar incentives to go to disenfranchised areas, or the military, or federal research programs (NIH)... There are many ways to pay for school with other peoples' money.
If you were a giger-esque toxic creature, Earth might easily be toxic or otherwise unsurvivable for you, too. If you were a giger-esque toxic creature with excellent molecular engineering abilities, what would you do when you discovered earth? I'd get some samples, and then build myself something that could survive there. Maybe I'd model it on the dominant form of life. But smarter, and better for piloting. Smaller. Bigger brains. HMMM?
Right. That's nixonrichard's point. And your link still has nothing to do with that.
The difference is soliciting someone who exists versus thinking you're soliciting someone who exists, but who is actually imaginary. It would be like thinking you're talking to Mrs. Claus, then going to the North Pole, and getting hit with a "loss of affection" wife-stealing lawsuit (which exist in some states) by hacker Eskimos. 
&gt; Youre reaching, just because shes an annoying bitch (which ill heartily agree  &gt; with) doesnt mean she loses any of her rights including to protest in her view  &gt; unfair treatment. You are the one who is reaching. She had no right to protest during a traffic stop. It's not a peace rally. She could protest at her court hearing. And what was unfair about her treatment. She tried to bs the guy by telling him that he couldn't arrest her for not having a license. &gt; You need to watch the video again, the officer wanted this course of action  &gt; and he guided it to the conclusion he wanted (staying of course just within  &gt; the legal limits). Are you kidding? This guy didn't plan any of this ahead of time. He pulled her over for driving over the speed limit. She tried to tell him that he couldn't do that. No doubt he was going to let her go with a ticket for that, but she showed a complete disrespect for him and tried to tell him that he couldn't legally give him a ticket. No doubt, because of that disrespect he decided to bring the full weight of the law down on her. He found out that she was driving without a license and that meant that he had to arrest her. He wouldn't have had to arrest her if she had showed any respect for the law, but she didn't. So he had to call in another officer to assist him in the arrest. That's because taking anyone into custody is a dangerous position for a police officer to be in. Women are actually very dangerous to take into custody, because they aren't perceived as much as a threat. &gt; This same case happened here, legally the officer can request her to get out of  &gt; her car without stating the reason, common sense dictates he should state the  &gt; reason to avoid an altercation but he chooses not to so he can have his  &gt; outcome and stay within the boundary of the law. Even at this point he had no reason to tase her. He told her to leave the car. It doesn't matter that he didn't tell her why he wanted to her to get out. She's not a five year old child. He already told her that her license was expired. She would have to be mentally retarded to not realize why she was asked to get out. All that aside, it doesn't matter why he asked her to get out. An officer has the right to make you get out of your vehicle. Any idiot knows this, and you don't have the right to disobey at that point in the justice system. You have the right to lodge a complaint later. What you fail to see is that this woman wasn't showing disrespect for the officer, she was showing disrespect for the law. She refused to comply with a lawful order given to her by a duly appointed officer of the law. She wasn't disrespecting him, she was disrespecting the law and the wishes of the voters who enacted those laws. She was not above the law and she was punished for thinking otherwise. I have no sympathy whatsoever. 
Yah, I hate well-written, thoughtful, insightful posts, too. We need more pictures of cats and 1 paragraph blog posts about the iPhone.
What a tool. He could have just provided a link instead of his toolish little video.  (and he would still be wrong).
I just realized that this apparently won't be released for PC. However if you can trust Gamespot, there will be a Civ V released at some point. http://www.gamespot.com/pc/strategy/civilizationv/index.html?tag=result;title;8
It's hard to say whether social networking has trully lost its virginity yet. No doubt, it will tell all of his friends that it did.
I liked the part when they showed the gameplay.
I think your alot more likely to die in a car accident than to get hit by a terrorist bomb, yet you arent going around playing up car accidents. your fiance and your childs school are just playing to emotion. so yeah, stiff upper lip lads
&gt;The words, we have never been a target of any terrorism ever are quite implicit in their meaning. I'll give you the benefit of the doubt and assume you mean "explicit". In any case, that statement is logically separate from his first statement, that "this is the only terrorist incident in Scotland's history". All I was doing is pointing out that the statement "This is the only terrorist incident in Scotland's history" is categorically wrong, and brushes aside probably the most tragic event to occur in Scotland in the last 25 years. Your point is that it is contextually convincing that the OP meant something different. My counter-point is that even if that is true, the statement remains literally wrong. You can ignore the structure of English all you like, it won't change what the OP posted.
yesss best ever
Patriotism at this extreme would be the last refuge of scoundrels.
As a teaser trailer, I guess this is cool. Unfortunately, the description of the game in the video's voiceover is applicable to any of the games in the Civilization series thus far. "Explore new lands. Lead your civilization. Become the greatest ruler the world has ever known."
AS a person who worked in hospital tell me - without lying: is everebody can have best available service for free? Are you doctors are ready to work for 1/10 of your salary? If yes - no problem -  no insurance - no money everybody will be treated in private hospital which looks like Hilton hotel and US will provide it for free.  You are funny man - when doctors having 200k-300k a year - it is impossible to give everybody free perfect service. I saw such a service in Soviet Union ( if it sill would exists I'm sure Moore would be singing songs about it also). So when everybody has a same service - it is shitty service for everbody - thats how it works. I'm not saying reach people "Rich people have more of a right to live than poor people do." (exactly as you are not saying "let us give to everybody same shitty service"). But it will be always something that people will be ready to pay money. And I'm not talking about heart transplant - i'm talking about right to choose your doctor. about right to have single room in private hospital. About paying for second opinion with specific doctor I want. I do not see a problem with that. And btw what did you do in hospital?  
This isn't a blog post, and it isn't by Paul Graham. It is however a good story, but since it takes over two screens of scrolling and contains only one picture (and it isn't even a lolcat!) I guess it's difficult to focus on for some people.
YES
Let me get this straight: We should be afriad that if Murdoch gets control of the WSJ that he'll shift the arch-conservative organ's politics ever-so-slightly to the right.
How does a "want" get a pill?
Hah. Good point. I'd like to see that.... Sergent-at-Arms vs. a Marine squad--good times.
This would be the case if and only if there was a single programmer writing the code and he (or she) based all of the program's techniques/knowledge of the game off of his own knowledge and experiences (without soliciting advice from "experts" or etc.).  he'd also have to be able to recall and utilize all those techniques that he programmed in when he actually plays chess, and remember moves/board positions as accurately as a computer can.
China continues to ignore basic environmental considerations. It its rush to become the dominant power in the World China is riding roughshod. We will all pay a huge price.
You are fuking idiot. I'm software developer in electronic industry. I even do not live in US... And if you believe only stuff that you want to believe you are more stupid than you sounds.  Will you have a minimal decency to apologize - or will your post stay here forever as a proof of your stupidity.   
&gt; Well really, what's worse, being deprived of a wage and a title, or getting a limb blown off and/or carrying deep psychological scars?  Speaking as an enlisted soldier: I evaluated those risks. Odds of my limbs being blown off are about as bad as the odds of me dying in a traffic accident on the highways. Really, the Army would pay for my medical bills; the only times people go broke because of medical issues are when they want special, extra shit that's really not necessary or when they got injured doing something they were warned not to (e.g. driving drunk).  &gt; Is it worse to have to work out a new future/career after a dishonorably discharge, or to do so anyway after they're done using you? Yes, it is worse to work out a future career after a dishonorable discharge with an incomplete degree. Dishonorable discharge would mean I lose my GI Bill benefits so I'm back to square one when I was finished with high school: poor grades (I was good at tests, but almost never showed for class) and not wanting to bury myself in debt.  Some of us happen to have families to support, too, so yea -- not the best option. At least dying in Iraq means a hefty life insurance pay off. I choose to follow what's best for me in the long run instead of opting to follow some idealistic crap. Sorry, but  my odds of getting blown up or killed are minor and worth it in the long run. Education covered, tons of money to be banked while deployed and life insurance for my family if I die. I'm sorry, but unless you're in my shoes please don't shove your bullshit down my throat. I get enough of that through propaganda and the media.
does the network store a representation of entire board while looking at a particular section?
Boy, it's really amateur hour, isn't it?
Yes, I was going to comment on this. It was always strategically cut off. But the women *do* have their faces shown. Yet his lifestyle can't be such a secret.  And the reporter never mentioned this stipulation.
thank you reddit
Not true that anyone (on either side) becomes fair game. There are blind follows on both sides that fit the republitard mould or the demonrats mode. And as you know, a republitard or demonrat by any other name would still smell as stink.
Glad I'm not the only one who thought so.  The public works system was so much more realistic and easier to maintain than building a bazillion workers.  And underwater cities rocked.  Admittedly, the space cities were kinda lame, and there were a lot of bugs, but I wish the Civ series would copy more from their bastard child.
"Because of the practice of female infanticide in Tibet, there had been a relative shortage of females. Polyandry resolved the problem by allowing a few men to marry one woman." Ironically enough, this practice still goes on in China.
Ahahah i just digged trough.... this and found up what does the php script does? "Date\tSun, 01 Jul 2007 00:13:49 GMT  Server\tApache  Location\thttp://www.bitchslapp.com/rand/1.html  Content-Length\t245  Cneonction\tclose  Content-Type\ttext/html; charset=iso-8859-1  " This is one of the response i got from the apache test.... Damn... So the php script does load  http://www.bitchslapp.com/rand/1.html  But bitchslapp is the IIS6 server...???? so when it start the php script on the apache server  it does something on the IIS6 server...? It sounds a bit normal that it should be slower because apache need to load something that isn't local while IIS6 is loading everything on his website...   
good idea. In general thats how US system was "supposed" to work...
Reporters aren't taught "fairness, balance". Accuracy, yes. But the main thing is objectivity. Yes, show it from both sides. But that doesn't mean swallowing spin and giving it to the public as fact. Reporters now aren't trying hard enough -- there aren't any good muckrakers left to with the cojones left to expose government and business corruption.
It may be a bit sleazy for Google to actively pursue the HMOs to buy ads, but the service being offered is no different from their normal advertising services.
Interesting, been here way before you.  Apparently Digg users ARE destroying reddit.
Linkjack, the person who really did the art should get some credit :/ Downmod, I suggest you do the same.  http://www.deviantart.com/deviation/51002758/?qo=4&amp;q=south+park+family&amp;qh=boost%3Apopular+age_sigma%3A24h+age_scale%3A5
The SNR ratio of a sound card will not make a dick of difference, especially with an album recorded in the 70's. The quality of the DA converter used will make a huge difference. And, everyone, please stop using these shoddy "computer speakers" that are getting ever increasingly expensive. Get a reasonably priced pair of studio monitors which will have decent imaging and accurate spectrum reproduction. Then you'll be in audio heaven.
She is making same point as me, actually. If a person is in fact a 'tard, barks like a 'tard, etc, then prolly is a 'tard.  Of course she could have been more personal and say Ricktard, and if that's your objection, then yeah, you got a point there.
2 Asian men? wow!
I suppose each of the women must be content in this arrangement - the guy is obviously providing well for his family, at least before college costs hit. If they want a stable environment in which to breed, this is OK. But aren't they thinking about their sons? They must know that if this lifestyle continues, and each man has three wives, then  2/3 of their sons will remain alone. How do they deal with this? How do they wrap their heads around the math? Is this the same willful blindness that makes the Pope ignore the realities of exponential growth when making policy on birth control?
"The Daily Mash is a satirical news website which exposes the absurdities of modern life to rigorous scrutiny with "hilarious results" (citation needed here - ed)."
Im in ur tubes, achieving full penetrationz.
You know all about the march, do you?
Amen. People's cowardice makes them easy to control.
yes the communist propaganda is pretty strong
It doesn't matter if no minor ever existed. It doesn't matter if they had a last minute pang of guilt. They already committed the crime of soliciting a minor. They were fully intending to commit the crime of molesting a minor. And your argument that the non-existence of the minor somehow affects this is asinine. **They believed that the person they were talking to was a minor. Intent is what matters.** The child doesn't have to exist, because if the child had existed they would have done the same thing. You don't let someone go for a robbery, because the bank was lying about having money.
The healthcare the government already provides in this country sucks so why do we want to expand that shitty coverage to all Americans?
I made that mistake over 10 years ago when I dismissed C++ myself (I really had no one to show me any better at the time). So I stuck with C. I think the perfect compatibility of C++ with C source was a mixed "blessing" for that reason. Still, had C++ made a clean break, would it have been as successful ?  Personally I feel its a shame for me, as it was years later when I watched colleagues writing pretty OO C++, but the industry had moved on (and so had I - didn't need to write that many drivers and DSP apps in C myself anymore). If I had my time again I would have given C++ more of a go. Cest la vie !
A Richard Feynman fanfic... never thought I'd see that day.
Reddit is not better that any other slice of human society - overwhelming majority is so stupidly sure in their rightness. They just have different gos which words a saint. The Saint Moore. The Mighty DailyKoss himself. 911truth and e.t.c. The gray levels are for stupid - here people believe that they are white.
There's his new slogan: "Ron Paul: The Red Shirt of 2008." Oh, wait. Not a good idea.
Go is just a matter of a branching factor.  It can be approached the same way; it just takes exponentially more computing power.  A winning computer awaits only Moore's law. Many-player Hold'em poker is profitable via an expert system, without even any fancy tricks at all.  Heads-up hold 'em already has some good bots.  The luck factor is high enough with modern WSOP main event fields that historically good players find themselves booted early as a regular happenstance.  Thus, a bot as good as the best human players is still extremely unlikely to win.  That said, there are plenty of people working on proprietary poker bots.   
He wasn't there nor was his immediate family touched directly by it. It was just too brutal and inhumane + Japan is too slow to apologize since they themselves have a couple of handy excuses of craters on their own backyard. Being hit so hard it is somehow acceptable to limp speechless for awhile.
It's about time the news went back to being news about stuff that matters instead of propaganda and celebrity pap.
Oh, good. Let's airdrop the "scholars" at all these conservative Washington think-tanks into Baghdad with as much ordnance as they can carry.
Good to see someone has some values. I am floored by the general cowardice displayed in the comments to this story. I understand the fear, but to let that fear control you to the extent you'd wouldn't help an endangered 2 year old is pathetic.
Christian terrorists strike again.
It seems like currently the trend is to demonize people with Antisocial Personality Disorder; at least perhaps people with Borderline Personality Disorder will have a break from being the ultimate villain in "psychology" vulgarization writings. I wonder who's next.
It's not like the blastocyst/zygote/fetus/baby is going to be terrified in its last moments, like someone about to be executed. It isn't like there has been a large societal investment being written off, either. The baby, as a victim of murder, is only a consideration if you believe in a soul, and not everyone does. No other dogma asserts that a person immediately be granted all rights at conception. As a pluralistic society, we must allow for beliefs that differ from our own, or risk civil war. There are many people who believe that hamburger is just as much a murder as an abortion (though I can't resist delicious cowflesh, myself). As Freakonomics points out, legal abortion lowers crime rates in a decade or two. This suggests that those not aborted, that would have been, become criminals (or even just angry, bitter, poor, or poorly raised). Even the Bible makes it clear that a baby has no value until it is one month old:  And thy estimation shall be of the male from twenty years old even unto sixty years old, even thy estimation shall be fifty shekels of silver.... And if it be a female, then thy estimation shall be thirty shekels.  And if it be from five years old even unto twenty years old, then thy estimation shall be of the male twenty shekels, and for the female ten shekels.  And if it be from a month old even unto five years old, then thy estimation shall be of the male five shekels of silver, and for the female thy estimation shall be three shekels of silver.  And if it be from sixty years old and above; if it be a male, then thy estimation shall be fifteen shekels, and for the female ten shekels.   —Leviticus 27:3-7  Number the children of Levi after the house of their fathers, by their families: every male from a month old and upward shalt thou number them. And Moses numbered them according to the word of the LORD.   —Numbers 3:15-16
Make more prescription drugs over the counter for starters.
I have put a great deal of thought into this and I think there are two main reasons for it.  First off the taxes on the *middle class* are high and they basically make it so if you make under 90-80 grand a year your bring home pay is not all that different as someone that makes 30-40.  I think this is done to keep people wanting to lower taxes because the upper part of the *middle class* would, much like the upper class(millionaires with a small rather than large M which in other time periods compared to billionaires would have been considered the real middle class and likely will in history books in a couple hundred years) like to invest and climb the social and economic ladder.  The other key reason is that socialization of anything has been discredited since the 70's since it was blamed for the recession that had more to do with Vietnam than social programs and then each politician thereafter became more interested in de-funding those programs and low and behold they fell apart but we were told that it never worked although the lack of funding or oversight and management never came up.  Repub administration after Repub administration threw us into debt over our heads to, as W. himself stated "promote fiscal responsibility" which means to force the government to cut and de-fund public programs perpetually to pay off a growing deficit and its interest.  Funny that we believe social programs dont work considering I have never seen a fully funded and well managed social program in my lifetime and im in my 30's even Clinton cut funding of programs below a level that some of them could function on.  Of course politicians want to privatize everything then we will not hold them accountable for doing a bad job.  BTW on that last point have you ever tried complaining to a multi national Corp that has privatized something???  They are none to receptive and unlike the government it is not nor has it ever been there job to protect us nor take care of programs we paid for as citizens  .
One word. "Owned!"
Human interest stories are one thing, but the movie doesn't even attempt to bring out objective facts. Graphs and data would mean alot more to scientists and policy wonks, who are in positions to help fix the health care industry. The whole problem with the health care debate in the US is the way it has been contextualized, and no amount of cold, rational comparison of our system to other nations has ever been seriously and sincerely attempted.  Ultimately, somebody has to show what the consequences are. Those consequences are grim: we are systematically propagating the belief that unlimited medical care, pharmaceutical development, and high-cost, high-tech examinations cost nothing and that if someone can't get them a tragedy has occurred.  Furthermore, supporters of a single-payer, nationalized health system never mention how they will transform finite resources into 100% health care without denying people medical care.
&gt;In summary, the firebombing of japan was perhaps the most devastating single military campaign in history. No, I think the Japanese hold that distinction w/ the [Rape of Nanking](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rape_of_Nanking).
My site is about the science of astrology and loads of good information that will interest the beginner as well as the seasoned pro.  I have a large extensive compatibility area for all 12 signs as well as a parent/child relationship sector..
&gt; Concentrating on the algorithm for a basic arithmetic operation was typical of Richard's approach. **He loved the details.** In studying the router, he paid attention to the action of each individual gate and in writing a program he insisted on understanding the implementation of every instruction. **He distrusted abstractions that could not be directly related to the facts.** Nice :) ... More: &gt; Richard would give a sentence-by-sentence critique of the planned presentation. "Don't say 'reflected acoustic wave.' Say [echo]." Or, "Forget all that 'local minima' stuff. Just say there's a bubble caught in the crystal and you have to shake it out." **Nothing made him angrier than making something simple sound complicated.**
Disappointed it's only for the XBox360 and the PS3. The Wiimote  would work well on a strategy title, and the cinematics we saw weren't exactly GTA4-level.
For sure. And I'd also help operate gas chambers during a purge of dissidents. Not.
Exactly.  That's why the state needs to take care of the populace so they don't become criminals in the first place.  And education has been shown to reduce crime levels... which brings us right back to the original argument.
I think we have our next prime-time reality show!! **BOSS KILLERS: Caught in the act!**
I need to watch it through again, but it would be interesting if only two of the wifes were shown, i.e. he had a public wife to show clients etc.
Sounds kinky.
I have a equally valid quote. "THIS! IS! SPAAARRTTTAAAA!"
this is so fake.
FTA: "Instead of reading a story and finding out that black is black, you now read a story and it says, 'Some say black is black, and some say black is white.'" Mainstream journalism is bowing too much to both "sides," and too concerned with political correctness rather than the actual facts. The truth should not be balanced against lies.
Why don't you read the f'ing article first.
This may just be a placeholder representing the rumors they heard of a new Civilization game, which would in fact be Revolutions. But, we non-console owners can still hope!
Shoddy work is usually claimed when local prosecutors don't want to prosecute. None of the other cities seem to have any problem getting a conviction with to catch a predator's methods. I've heard that mantra repeated continuously and I still haven't seen a concrete example of shoddiness in to catch a predators methods. They have chat logs, video of the offenders arriving with condoms, and admissions of guilt in most cases.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Yakko%27s_World
Have to confess I was a bit disappointed that there wasn't a picture of Gene Simmons.
You can't get an Apple computer with 1 GB of memory and a medium-high end dedicated graphics board for $600.
Comic Sans! ARGH MY EYES! THE GOGGLES DO NOTHING!
&gt;An interresting effect is for instance that you can create religious experiences by magnetic stimulation. I always thought the Robertson followers were breathing the prozac pumped in and in the water.  But he would love to get some programmed religious experiences to fill out his show.
The why did you say "No rules - you kill and destroy without mercy"?
If new software created the old format *by default*, you might have a point. Microsoft's entire strategy is to change the file format to force upgrades: if anyone in the world is going to send you an attachment with version N+1, your version of software that understands version N is useless.  N has been abandoned in terms of real-world usage and functionality. If they had not abandoned file format N, your version N+1 would still produce it, see?
Interesting that they chose Groovy as the primary scripting language for a *web* framework. Wouldn't Javascript on JVM (e.g. Rhino) be a better choice?
お題があるとついやってしまうプログラマの習性をうまく一箇所にまとめられたら結構有益な情報源になるかも
I'm with you.  I realize no system is perfect.  I also recognize that Canada's is alot closer to what's needed than our own here in America.
Thank you!!  I'm so tired of seeing the mindless "tin foil hat" response to anything out of the ordinary.  These people seem "Hannitized" if you ask me.
If look at the whole title, including the part where it says "It's great that we have that Media Equalizer!", from that I don't think it would be wrong to assume that the poster is implying "understands" in this context means to mean to both understand and advocate.
Obviously, but look at the way the map depicts them. It's is kind of funny, they really do look "sprinkled" over the ocean, and they're all much bigger than actual Pacific islands.
I will buy a console if needed, the Civ franchise has ruled my life. With mods available on the web, I play Civ close to 8 months per year. I am a loser junkie... sue me.
Terrorism in the defense of liberty is no crime... Er, something like that. Edit: I guess it's not obvious that I'm mocking right-wing stupidity here.  (Or, alternatively, maybe I'm being modded down by right-wing idiots.  :-)
awsome
...don't know about the age of the Universe, but if you are of the belief that the Earth is only 6,000 years old, then this tooth is ~166.6666666667 times older than the Earth.
The wealthy and famous are idolized. people love to see them having problems, because it makes them seem more like us, and makes us seem not so far removed from them. People dream of being rich and famous, so their lives fascinate people. It's just the way it is. And it's not just this country, it's this way all over the world. Personally, I like to see things like this because it disgusts me that just because she was born from a rich family, that she is so elevated above us "commoners" that she doesn't even have a clue about how real life works. It gladdens me when the elite get knocked down a peg, and have realize they're not better than anyone else.
Let’s adress these ridiculous assertions one by one shall we? 1. Driving is Dangerous. Riding a bicycle is dangerous. So is skiing. Crossing the street. Having unprotected sex… There are a lot of dangerous things you can do. There are also lots of ways to ensure you do not die in a car: wear a seatbelt, drive defensively, take extra care, drive to survive. Your point is taken, but is largely moot. 2 Driving Makes You Fat. In fact, eating makes you fat. Driving affects fitness if (and only if) driving means you get no exercise. Incorrect: Point 2 debunked. 3 Cars Are Destroying the Planet. Please cite sources. Incorrect: cars are NOT destroying the planet. Destroying the planet with cars is the dumbest thing I have ever heard. Please present a scenario where this could occurr. Yeah, I didn’t think so either. Incorrect: Point 3 debunked. 4 Driving Cars Drives You Crazy. Well, if you’re a poorly adjusted moron with very little brain, then yeah, you might have a point. But if you’re a normal person, it just gets a bit frustrating every now and then. If you find it that bad, move to a different city, or find a job closer to home. Inaccurate: Point 4 debunked. 5 Driving Is Not Affordable. If driving is unaffordable, then you should not be doing it, that’s entirely correct. But for the vast majority of people, driving is NOT unaffordable. I pay about $1000 a month in maintenance alone on my daily driver, and gas is another $400-500 a month on top of that. Fortunately, our household income makes this a trivial expense. Others are not so fortunate (read as “skilled”) so they should select vehicles for which the Total Cost of Ownership is within their reach. Budgeting is (I know) a lost art in the USA, where you all act like temporarily embarrassed millionaires, wven if you earn $22,000 a year. It is however, a requirement in order to live life without going bankrupt. Inaccurate: Point 5 debunked. 6 The Oil Industry is Evil. Categorically false. You owe your lifestyle to the oil industry. Without it, you’d be living in a mud hut burning cow dung to stay warm. Oil has powered the entire industrial age, and all of human civilisation. While some elements within the oil industry are less than savoury, the same can be said for all industries. The real story is of course, that arseholes and scumbags are attracted to oil billions like flies to shit, and not that there ius anything inherently evil about oil itself or the oil industry in general. To make such an assertion merely highlights your immaturity and lack of clear thinking on the subject. Inaccurate: Point 6 debunked. 7 Communities Are Made of People, not Parking Lots. Correct. Now I want you to name all your neighbours and I consider any property which touches yours to be a neighbour. I bet you can’t. So get off your high horse about that bullshit. If your community is made out of parking lots, then you chose a really bad place to live: choose another and move there. Inaccurate in the extreme: point 7 debunked. 8 Cars Deaden and Destroy Cities. That may be true for your city, but that does not make it true for all cities. Gross generalisations are a very poor platform for an argument, are you sure you want to go there? Provided cities are designed and maintained properly, the car does not deaden, nor destroy a city. In fact, the car enables the city, and enlivens it, the exact opposite of what you say. Inaccurate: Point 8 debunked. 9 Local Businesses Need Local Customers. Then shop locally! A car doesn’t prevent you from doing this at all. In fact, the rising cost of car ownership should be helping this to occur automatically. Utterly inaccurate: Point 9 debunked. 10 If You Want To Walk Tall, You Have to Walk. Firstly, Americans did NOT invent the car. That would be the Europeans. Henry Ford invented a good way to make lots of them cheaply (and it was a great idea too!) but since the Europeans and Asians discovered they could make lots of cars too, they have completely eclipsed US car makers: who still are stuck in the automotive stone age  . Is it any wonder US car makers have their backs to the wall? Look at the complete crap they make! The complete lunacy of your ideas here are breathtaking. You say the car is holding you back, and yet you mention all the things that cars enable! Sorry - you can’t have it both ways. That cars are NOT the perfect mode of transport is undeniable - and the imperfections are multiplied if you live in a society which has not planned properly for its future. However, you see some bad things about cars and throw the baby out with the bathwater. Your logic if flawed at every point, and your assumptions are flat out false. Your “facts” are mostly wrong. May I suggest that if you are so down on cars, that you sell all yours, and silently enjoy your carless life, rather than bleating on about how you *think* cars are “ruining everything”.
Do you have a live webcam of you playing?
Oh *please*.  Is he also the only thing you have left to keep yourself from jumping off the top of some skyscraper or plunging into the Potomac?  Call the suicide hotline, fast!
I don't feel this particular song promotes anything much at all, except the cheezy white shades. And Akira.  Money, cars, women, golden chains, champagne, chrome fenders - that's what it's usually about. More often people listen to music because of what it represents than for the music itself, and they shape their life in correspondance to that, or have been shapen by the people sorrounding them. It's easier to present that visually, therefore music videos are crucial here.  
Biggest lesson to learn?: Most of the stories you choose to report are a joke. Generally, I believe that main stream media should have their title as "Journalist" yanked, the same way a state licensing body would yank the self-ordained title "engineer" away from a 9 year old who decided to bid on heavy construction contracts through the innovative use of legos.
I've always felt sorry for Asian guys, although the ones who have it worst are Indians.  Man, those guys get NO play.   
You make good points. I agree, with the amount of influence that large corporations and wealthy individuals have in US government, Washington's policies come as little surprise. The general pattern over the last couple of decades is, as you indicate, to run up a deficit which then justifies the cutting of social programs. Politicians can then proclaim "See? Social programs are expensive and inefficient. It's better that we turn over Program X to the private sector," and the transfer of public American wealth to private hands continues. With regards to my last point (about defense spending), yes, I agree that complaining to Lockheed Martin won't do much. But as it is your tax dollars that Washington uses to buy those F-22 Raptors at $361 million per unit, it is Washington that you should be complaining to. Not that I'm naive enough to think it will actually do much good, in the current state of things.
Variant translations: For the majority, to be educated is to be a coward, and to be strong is to be a fool. If a man does not appreciate the importance of both knowledge and strength, he is condemned to be a coward or a fool. (I find it ironic that in the second one, condemned was spelled as "condemed.")
Keep calm and carry on.
I just found out that a virus can actually make some changes on your registry so that the virus will run automatically whenever you execute a file. Imagine, the virus will be loaded each time you run an executable (EXE) or a batch file. I found out how it works and also how to disable the virus from running automatically whenever I run any file.
For the record, I completely agree that RICKARD5 is retarded and a Republican (assuming he is not a troll).
&gt; And your argument that the non-existence of the minor somehow affects this is asinine. What a bizarrely Orwellian statement.  Your argument is beyond asinine -- it's asi**ten**. &gt; They already committed the crime of soliciting a minor. Wrong.  They did not solicit a minor.  You can't solicit someone who doesn't exist.   They attempted to solicit the imaginary personage of a minor played by an adult, supplying made-up details of someone who did not exist and who the accused could never meet.  Whatever laws they make about that, it does not change the *fact* that no minor was solicited. &gt; **Intent is what matters.** You just contradicted yourself.  You just said, "It doesn't matter if they had a last minute pang of guilt."  You can't establish intent if you don't know whether they really intended to do it.  All you can prove intent-wise is intent to go to the house. Beyond that, you don't know if they actually planned to stick their woo-woo into anyone or not.  They might've intended to if the minor met their criteria, but no minor existed.  They might've changed their mind at the last minute, who knows. Making up imaginary people and then busting citizens for what they *thought about doing* to them is horribly Orwellian. &gt; You don't let someone go for a robbery, because the bank was lying about having money. "Let" them "go for" a robbery?  You mean like a fake branch that has no money and no customers, only a sting team, and they use it to bait people into *intending* to rob it, i.e., showing up?   
Yes, because we all know that MTV and Viacom have a vested interested in spending tens of millions of dollars each year on health insurance for their employees, instead of getting the government to pay for it.
That was so funny!
I've heard it's the coming thing.
Well, I could get philosophical and try to explain how humanity's most urgent *want* drove the development of contraceptives, but I'd rather be honest - it was a typo:  on her 13th birthday, the (later 180-lover) girl was asked by her mother if she **wanted** to sleep with boys - she said yes, and got a present of condoms and the pill.  I had meant to write **one**, but somehow, **want** doesn't fit in so badly either, does it?
#1 - Uh, no.  That's what the US National Security apparatus felt about these types of threats.  Please look up the Boijinka Plot - none of which detail was ever made widely available to the public (until after 9/11). Sorry we don't all wet our pants like you when the Gov't tries to make Padilla, Lodi, Lockwanna, Brooklyn Bridge torcher and Star of David into existential threats to western civilization. #2 - There is, obsolutely, no way our foreign policies could ever have any negative consequences.  These terrorists are just random, insane actors whose actions are completely unpredictable. #3 - Obviously, terrorist acts around the world have just plummeted since 9/11 and the Iraq war.  There is no possible correlation or connection between our post-9/11 policies and terrorist recruiting.  If you think otherwise, you're just unhinged with BDS.
He could try...I dunno, sitting down with her and Mommy and explaining things in terms she can understand? Yeah, she'll lose some of her innocence, but it's up to him to decide whether she loses it by learning from him and Mommy or by losing it to someone in a much different way a few years from now.
They need to have some sort of scale so one can tell how large it is.
Does that mean she's only mathematically been halfway around the block?
I actually have a bunch of these switches in my home and never could figure out exactly how they worked. Thanks!  As for the Java analogy, I was still able to turn my lights on and off, and dim them, without fully understanding how the switches worked.
It's pretty high visibility now that it's made it do Boing Boing, Reddit and Digg.
Does every pathetic attempt at a terrorist attack in the US &amp; UK have to be a big news story? At least this is an article worth voting up, one that realistically says these guys didn't give us much reason to be afraid instead of saying "my God, we were so close to such chaos and destruction and a massive breakdown of order etcetera..."
&gt;My problem with this story has always been that the aliens looked human-like. As a biologist, this seems totally absurd if they actually came from elsewhere. Really? I have to disagree. The mechanics of our bodies are a reflection of how we interact with the world. We were able to create the first tools because we have opposable thumbs. We see in color and shades within the visual spectrum because of cones and rods in our eyes. It's also said that upright running by Homo Erectus greatly increased the number of brain cells. Perhaps our's is the shape of intelligence. This is why dolphins are never going to be a match against us - unless they evolve to be upright, with opposable thumbs.
very cool list of lists of iphone tips
It's "water neutral".  They split water to get the hydrogen, you know.
Can't find the reddit alien.  Are we not cool enough for 2.0?
Now Detroit is exporting their lovely way of life.
That's their business, really. I think we'd all be a little disconcerted to know how "experienced" the women in our lives are. Thinking about it isn't helpful at all; you can't do anything about it.
This just in: Google officially Evil(tm). Internet Web 2.0 crowd shocked. Now, let's talk about how google trims most content producers out of the long tail with their $100 monthly Ad Sense revenue limit and then drops their account for ill-defined "account violations" when they do cross the $100 barrier.   Google's biggest innovation?  Figuring out how to get people to give up their web real estate and eyeballs for free while robbing advertisers blind with their key words "arbitrage" scheme. Google has been evil for a long, long, long time.
I haven't kept up with this. Don't believe in fairies. But, it sure appears that something happened out there and those involved aren't being straight with us. The answers given don't match what is known and my BS meter on the gov explanation is off the scale. Toxic Waste? Nazi, Yellow uranium, WMF and tubes? At least our great leaders are consistent.
I think that if the government can do something cheaper and better, they should be allowed to do it, and compete in the marketplace.  If other companies can't compete enough to do it better or cheaper, than they go out of business.   Think FedEx/UPS.  They are able to do a number of things better than the USPS, and so people use them for those things.  They offer special pickup and distribution deals with businesses.  Comparative rates.  Comparative or better service.   Medical companies should be in the same position.  Medicine is what keeps our society alive, and as such, it is of key importance to that entire society.  So let's allow our government a chance to use taxpayer dollars to develop something that gives everyone in the country fair, equitable, universally available solid health care.   If health insurance companies can do it better - better prices, better service, better health care - then they will be able to win in the marketplace.  If they can't, then they will go out of business.
Sorry but the staff shortage has nothing to do with money, at least it's not the main point. The guys at the [MCC](mcc.ca) are the guilty part in this situation, making it too hard to enter medical college and making it almost impossible for foreign doctors to work in. And it's more obvious in BC where the medical council there is more harsh, in a way that he doesn't accept doctor from other territories or more exactly makes it hard for them to get in. Those kind of medical association act more for the good of some doctors than the population in itself.
I'm sorry I can't continue this argument with you. I just can't continue to pretend that your arguments are worth debating. They are silly and stupid, and I have to assume that by association you are a silly and stupid person. I realize this may seem harsh or perhaps you'll assume that you've defeated me, and you won this argument. In fact, I'm fairly sure you will. It's sad, but I've just realized that you are a stupid person.
What's the point of keeping the URI of a document but changing the content?  If it's different content, give it a different URI. (This doesn't include front pages of sections of a website; but particular publications shouldn't change document format underneath you.) 
Why wouldn't they be human like? They're always human like on Star Trek. Although I suppose any intelligent life would have to have large heads and long armilike things with hand like things.
What in the world is stopping Meier from remaking Alpha Centauri?  It would be an amazing game with just updated graphics, but would also provide the foundation of a great series.  I'd much rather have Alpha Centauri 2 and 3 with the creative potential of multiple storylines in outer space than Civ VIII.
Krugman is about as socialist as someone from Canada, the UK, or France, and those are all democratic countries. Anyway, what does democracy have to do with Rupert Murdoch buying media outlets and slanting the coverage to fit his business interests?
I think americans should stop talking about the movie and start talking about their fucked up health system.
I'm not sure. What do you think? Anyone have a definitive answer to that? Who's for sure either way on that?
...Except for the "fic" part.
Well, the preceding decades were characterised by computers which were massively too slow to do the brain-dead number crunching at all well. The only hopes of building a chess computer lay in figuring out a clever way of playing chess, or waiting for fast hardware to come along. Which, when you think about it, is exactly the situation we're in today with Go; we could throw a computer with a million 80-core CPUs at the problem, or try to short-circuit the process by thinking up some clever Go-playing system.
The costs of a possible misinterpretation are so high (based on 'deterrence' principle of punishment) that it simply isn't worth it for a man put themselves at risk. One is effectively putting their future on the line for someone else's offspring in a cataclysmic  -- but viable -- scenario. Here's another example of this in action: I am told not to give feedback to job interviewees. None. Because they may sue the company. There is no incentive for anyone to give feedback anymore because the potential mess is so great. The only solution to this problem is to make the incentives and disincentives equalize. If the company were paid for each bit of feedback they gave, then we'd probably do it more often, presuming the numbers worked out.
Of course I am. Lockerbie does not count because as "soapybubble" says, it was bad timing. The flight was delayed, meaning that the timed bomb exploded over Scotland instead of over the Atlantic as was intended.  It was a case of extreme bad luck as the area where it happened is sparsely populated. Never less, a section landed on the town killing several entire families. With the exception of that **accident**, there has never been a terrorist incident in Scotland **ever**. We don't piss off people much, so like the Swiss we are generally immune from these problems. The London July bombings were also the first Islamic terrorist acts in Britain. You think I am making light of the situation? I think you do not understand the gravity of it all. Tony Blair has created a problem that will last for generations.
Obviously Lauren Turner, the Google "Account Planner" writing the blog, doesn't know much about marketing.   Usually you want to make your clients look GOOD, not like they are mega-corps out to crush the puny human moral sensibilities with ads.   Might as well beg for tobacco sponsors who want to fight all that bad lung cancer press too...  We should drop them a note with our feelings: googlehealthadvertisingblog@google.com
Was that Henry Rollins doing the voiceover?  it sounded a lot like him.
"Since you don't agree with me you are silly and stupid" is not an intellectually valid argument.  You already lost on merits, when you claimed the existence of a person is immaterial to a criminal investigation, and that they had solicited a minor, when, in fact, and without dispute, no minor had ever been solicited. Your *ad hominem* means you lose on style as well. By the way, the other thoughts you had about me -- which you didn't write down -- were anti-social, and the Thought Police are coming for you. 
I just finished watching the pilot of USA's newest edition to its summer lineup and I have to say Burn Notice has definitely earned a spot in my summer TV line up.  This quirky drama stars Jeffrey Donovan as Michael Westen, a spy who gets abruptly fired during a mission and must now find out who issued the burn notice on him in order to get his life back.
America is unique in it's approach to homelessness it seems based on those numbers. Elsewhere in the West we build hostels and provide housing for those that need it. The few people on the street are generally suffering from mental or social problems and have removed themselves from the system. However, this is rare, you just don't see people sleeping on the streets here. And never children. If there was a child found sleeping on the streets it would be sensationalised by the media here.
A couple of these uses are directly under attack from a faction of Wikipedia editors who have a very strict view of "encyclopedic" material. From the [talk page](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Talk:List_of_Futurama_episodes#Episode_notability) of the Futurama episode list, which was the example given in the article: &gt; Many or all of the existing individual episode pages for this series appear to fail the notability guidelines for television episodes, and have been tagged accordingly. ... Overly long plot summaries should be edited, to a maximum length of approximately ten words per minute of screen time. Trivia should be integrated into the body of the article, or removed if it is not directly relevant. Quotes and images should only be used as part of a critical analysis of the episode. ... Otherwise, when these pages come up for review in fourteen days, they may be redirected, merged or deleted. Much of the same criticism has been leveled at all sorts of fictional works, especially the "plot summary, themes, symbols, and other in-depth analysis", which frequently cannot be attributed to a reliable source. Even the "Future Planner" tip runs afoul of some Wikipedia guidelines. Articles and information for events that can be reasonably be expected to happen in the future, but have not yet been covered by mainstream press, are typically deleted.
Obviously the time traveling aliens went back to file the patent before the crash in order to draw suspicion away from themselves... DUH.
&gt;baseless belief that Mr. Bush made the Twin Towers go boom. What do you mean, "baseless"? His administration had all kinds of warnings, and they did *nothing*.
Cooool... Only in my wedding photos I get to climb on the tank too. :D
Have you found it yet? I know Kasparov was very upset, but I never read an article from him about it.
(1) Oceans aren't a global warming gas, water vapour is (2) Oil companies are working on ways to strip hydrogen from petroleum products instead of using water, and that could prove to be more energy efficient. I wouldn't jump to conclusions.
I understand that you want to give worthier artists their due, but I just wanted to say, in the original artist's comment on deviant art. He/She mentioned something along the lines of that this was simply a fan art and that it was not meant it be some great piece of art. It gained recognition because of the idea behind it, not necessarily because of the art. So, I wouldn't say the drawing is sloppy or amateur, considering what it is. A simple fan art. Not the Mona Lisa.
Education is investment at excellent returns. Those who go to college earn more money, paying that much more in taxes eventually than the cost of the education. We should give as much opportunity as possible now in the age of outsourcing.
Good point, but my rhetorical flourish isn't a binding statement.  I'd still regard bombing 60+ cities into ashes and ruin to be pretty merciless, wouldn't you? 
Obviously we need to put Stephen Hawking in a mecha.
They spy on our e-mail and phone conversations and they completely failed to catch this terrorist before he attacked? Ridiculous.
There were many big names at the JPL press conferences, but only one of them had the time to talk to a bored eight-year-old kid. I miss you, Richard. A lot. 
What a bullshit quote based on incorrect stereotypes.  With witty quotes like this, it's little wonder he's been relegated to a footnote in history.
Gasp! How dare he even suggest that the iPhone (praised be it's name) has ANY faults WHATSOEVER! ... Ok I'm done.
This was about time and absolutely necessary.
Surprize
i know it has many inaccuracies. I still think it is amazing that any of our old maps appeared close to the real thing (not counting the new world of course or parts of africa or asia).  It is easy for us to criticize with seeing earth from space many times. But in 1507 this was the extent of our exploration and it is sill amazing that a bunch of independent maps can come together and look somewhat like Europe.
Bootlegging.
Please mod both parents up. Everyone should understand, and then diseminate these basic facts so that people can stop being fooled by the recording and computer speaker industries. Eidolon, care to make recommendations for studio monitors?
AAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHahahhahahahahahahahahahhahahahaha If anyone buys for one millisecond that BUSH is the source of cronyism and corruption in Washington or the White House, I have some wonderful land in Arkansas to sell you!
less Bush..?
I was shocked to read that it came out in 1973.  I started listening to it in 1986 and thought it was new. I STILL listen to it. 
Jocelyn Elders was great, and Clinton didn't stand behind her when psychotic child abusers hell bent on forcing children into ignorance and shame got her canned.
[You think wrong.](http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/substantially)
Yep, it comes right after February each year. By the way, the 'M' is usually capitalized.
just doesnt have the same effect... hmm
Have any of you ever done the thing where you synch up the album with the movie The Wizard of Oz?  It's unbelievable.
1) You have a problem with tradition?  The President always puts in new US Attorneys when he is elected.  Fake outage 2) umm, ok I'm sure this is just as bad as Harriet Meyers and Alberto Gonzalez. 3) wow the executive appoints judges.  what an abuse of power. Oh wait, Bush appointed "cronies" to the Supreme Court.  Which is worse?
your right. I, for one, would like to know if this administrator would have done the same thing if it was a hetero couple. it never says that. It's just implied that it was because it was two girls kissing.
I don't think that Google is profiting from others' misfortune. What they are doing is profiting from providing a platform for health companies' rebuttals of one side of an issue.  Letting people hear both sides of a story is hardly harmful or evil: even if the people telling the one side have ulterior motives (or are wrong), the fact that these are clearly-marked advertisements should tip people off to that fact.
Dude, you're welcome to remain deluded.  You quote Clinton as saying something that he didn't say. You were wrong.
They obviously spent a lot on computer animation.  They should have spent a bit more on getting a decent voice actor. I was hoping they were going to be announcing an MMO with a Civ-style "overview" and I was excited.  Doesn't appear to be the case though.  Oh well. Also, the site appears to be nothing more than a teaser trailer announcing a new game.  Yawn.
nicely played. :) He is not a troll. I can attest to that. Rest assured, trolling is the least of his problems.
Like Canadian TV? I hear that's even _more_ boring.
Could you please explain why they are being evil? Because as far as I can tell, all they are doing is selling ads on their search, just like always. But I'd love to hear why they're being *evil*.
really?  this trailer is about the game he always wanted to make?  i'm not convinced.
That type of access is already in Peroria, IL and I'm pretty sure many other places. Students have RFID smart card ID's and they "check in" to all their classes by swiping the card by the door like getting on a bus. Parents can check this information at the schools web site and see exactly where their children are at all times.
I agree they were careless, but they weren't directly responsible. This administration has ignored warnings during its entire run, and that was just the first - and indeed one of the least devastating (see Katrina) - examples of their political aloofness.
Of my acquaintances, 95% log into Facebook at least daily. But we're nerdy engineering undergrads, not exactly *tweens*.
What frequency makes morons want to make insane posts on reddit? (Not you.)
Personally i believe youre deluding yourself, its very hard to convince me there isnt a very deep flaw running through most police departments today. On the letter of the law we both seem to be in agreeance, the officer did nothing illegal at all, where we split paths is whether we think this is a good thing or a bad thing. The primary purpose of a police officer or better yet the police entity as a whole is to protect and serve the citizens of the US, not to teach those who dont respect certain laws a lesson they wont soon forget. Will the police as a whole ever adhere to the protect and serve mantra? I doubt it, but there are varying degrees of following it and since the war on drugs it has gone downhill in a bad way. The absolute worst change is the reduction of 'beat police', meaning officers who were responsible for certain neighborhoods or even a large city block in urban areas. Had this officer been a beat police officer and known this woman or her family he wouldnt feel the need to exercise his ego and reassure himself that he is the law and he controls the situation. Out of all the people i knew in high school the only ones who wanted to become police officers after high school were the ones with obvious control issues and this is representative of the current climate of the police entity. If it were still the 'beat police' ideal of protect and serve none of these people i know would want to be police officers because it wouldnt give them what theyre looking for.
You hire Richard Feynman and then send him off to buy office supplies... wow...
Looks fishy.  Spammers?
Can we please impeach these people soon?
Grey's Law: *Any sufficiently advanced incompetence is indistinguishable from malice.*
&gt; This isn't a joke or some sort of political correctness one-upmanship, you stupid fuckwit. This is attempted murder. Oh please - are you sure you're British? You sound like a hysterical pansy, not someone who has actually lived through the IRA campaigns.  &gt; you turn a blind eye to the recent history of Islamist terrorist attacks, foiled attacks and threats. You mean like the [ricin plot](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ricin_plot) and that arch-terrist de Menezes? &gt; The chief constable ... added: "We believe the incident is linked to events in London yesterday And you suck up anything plod tells you like some kind of demented robot. As I said before, no wonder Iraq was such an easy sell with gulls like you. &gt; I suppose you think they were working for the IRA I've got no idea until there is some evidence - just like you. What I won't do is say 'ooh propane, must be them towelhead Muslims' like some kind of retarded latent racist. &gt; You thoughtless, childish shithead. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Treatment_of_Tourette_syndrome
or hes just retarded
You misunderstand what "ad hominem" means.  Saying that you are a lazybones and like building strawmen is not an ad hominem.  If, however, I said you must be wrong because you are a lazybones that likes to building stawmen -- that would be ad hominem.  However, I did not base my assertion that you are wrong on the fact that you are a lazybones who likes to build strawmen, I based it on the fact that news outlets had already reported the very thing you were going on about not being reported.  Your defense seems to be that I'm some kind of clairvoyant, who can peer deep into his crystal ball and predict what tomorrow's news cycle will bring.
Well, I would not put $100 on it, however I would not be at all surprised.
Oh nothing; it's a joke. One of the tasks once inside the virtual machine is to "crack" passwords by writing a "BASIC" program that would guess passwords based on a dictionary word plus two numbers. This variant of BASIC used Roman numerals for line numbers.
I agree completely with you here. The administration should be held accountable for its incompetence.
I keep looking for the one that says, roughly, "The Chinese people are like grass, you can mow them down but they'll just grow back again".
Oh yeah, and lets not forget Spring, TX, where the RFID student ID cards are piped right to the Sheriffs office as well. And that started 3 years ago in 2004. http://tinyurl.com/6wxck  
What the fuck does political correctness have to do with this?
Correction: Terrorism in the name of the white man is no crime.
Dennis Kacinuch even though he couldn't win an election if all the other candidates died(due to an extreme hatred by the MSM and a bad habit of telling the truth and having good ideas) has a brilliant idea of how to divert money that now goes into the military industrial complex.  A peace industrial complex.  Otherwise I am sorry to say that those that really rule(wall street and investors and of course those lovely think tanks) will not allow the military industrial complex to go away unless they have something equally as prosperous to trade it for.  Can you imagine though what this country could do if it began to churn out highly qualified doctors to the rest of the world like Cuba?  You mix that with our pop culture status and the world would swiftly love us again and want nothing more than to buy products just because they are American.  The more quickly we fix our foreign image the more quickly people will want made in America stamped on their clothes.  The internet is not the only reason why the world is becoming more multicultural the main reason in my opinion is people no longer see us as their hero's or possible saviors but as bully's and possible oppressors and that is bad for business in the long term.
&gt;To find out how well this would work in practice, Feynman had to write a computer program for QCD. **Since the only computer language Richard was really familiar with was Basic**, he made up a parallel version of Basic in which he wrote the program and then simulated it by hand to estimate how fast it would run on the Connection Machine. Take that, language snobs :)   
I am modding up for hilarity. (Nuclear family? Hello?) Man. Too awesome.   
Dear Sir, I write to you from LAGOS, NIGERIA on a matter of utmost importance. I am the SON of the director of the FREE EDUCATION OF NIGERIA. We have been given 300 LAPTOPS to which there is no power source. I ask your strictest confidence in...
What a load of crap. Just because you can compare America to other countries that have less than us, doesn't mean that our government isn't fucked up. Now heres the question, who the fuck do YOU work for?
The greeks had poets that were warriors. Alexander was taught by Aristotle. Patton was a historian. But now we believe Presidents should be idiots. Clinton faked it well. Bush is the real deal. We think that thinkers are cowards. Its quite pathetic.
Here's a PDF with a plausible explanation of the Roswell mystery:  http://uforeview.net/documents/issue11.pdf Summary: The US military was doing secret experiments with captured Japanese, many of which were continuations of secret Japanese programs, including some very creepy ones. One of them involved balloons that would drop gliders with very small Japanese pilots. One of these crashed, coincidentally right after the Kenneth Arnold sighting touched off the "flying saucer" craze, so one branch of the military thought they had found a real crashed saucer, while another branch was trying to cover up the secret experiments. Then they figured out that the popular idea of spaceships from other planets and a government cover-up was a great way to throw people off the scent of real secret programs, so over many years they fed fake stories to UFO researchers, including the whole MJ-12 thing.
Downmodded for lack of blood and horrific screaming from Coulter.
Actually the housing cycles more in the period of 15 year, peak to peak.  We're just coming off the top of an enormous peak (see the roller coaster visualization), so the cycle will be much, much longer (reference the Japanese property bubble).  I'm thinking 7 to 10 years before any deep-in-the-trough "bargains" will be available. ...but always remember that the US market reacts pretty quickly to any market inefficiencies (BTW, defaulting on your sub-prime mortgage is highly inefficient). So, I see something like this happening: The Chinese will soon realize that there's no real value to be had buying US debt (actually, I think they've already come to that conclusion); so, they will eliminate the debt equities through the strategic purchase of various real estate trust and funds (who will be in deep poo-poo when the market crash is fully underway).  China will then cash their chips in two fold.  When immigration reform finally comes and foreigners are able to buy their way into American "democracy" for a few thousand dollars (don't kid yourself, this is *exactly* what immigration "reform" is about), Chinese banks will extract as much money as possible from communist-capitalists fleeing China's second greatest worker wage hike revolution by selling them package get-out-of-jail housing deal... and about the same time that the housing market begins to recover in the US, hundreds of thousands of new Mexi'mericans will get their first taste of semi-affordable, post liquidation boarded up for storage fixer-upper foreclosure homes (all they'll have to do is chase the crackheads off the property and replace the urine stained walls and floors). Unless you're able to hang on to your house and pass it down, your kids will more than likely pay their mortgage to a Chinese bank (they'll never know it of course, but that's where the money will go) One final thing to remember kids:  When national property markets go completely Tango-Uniform for extended periods of time, property/land reform happens.  It's already happening with eminent domain laws on the books now.  Look, the big boys know where things are headed and they've already planned for it a few years ago when they had the eminent domain laws enacted... and somehow, I'm not going to shed any tears when your defaulted on, sub-prime, shit-hole mac-mansion gets bulldozed to make way for some barely break-even, minimum-wage employing, service economy strip-mall. Enjoy your future America... you absolutely deserve it.
Whoa, whoa, Snookums. I agree with some of your points. The "pig" part on my side was wrong. I'll assume you or someone you know is a police officer. The officer has the right and duty to evaluate the percieved threat and use discretion. Better tase than risk a shank or a bullet. That being said, let's be absolutely clear on something: She had every right to protest, even if she was wrong. This is not a police, or a martial state as of yet. The officer is trained, armed, protected under the law, and paid to be a PEACE officer. His job entails confrontation with people that are not at ther best at that particular time. That strung-out bitch is every bit as entitled to every single article in the law as a sweet-talking young blonde that leans forward to welcome the cop. You state:  "because of that disrespect he decided to bring the full weight of the law down on her"  This is a dangerous notion to have: that as an armed officer you can either be lenient or ruthless based on whether the civilian, whom you serve like it or not, "respects" you.  You have seen too much TV and good cop - bad cop shows if you think the cop was right to tase, in her private property, someone who was clearly not a danger; based on when he decided he had had enough attitude from her.  As for your title, if I am right to assume you subscribe to a islamo-judeo-christian eye-for-an-eye faith, she would only have deserved to be tased if she had tased someone.  On a second thought, let's analyse the viddy:  Up to 1:27 he acted like a solid-golder. Law enforcement at it's best. But then he asks "why is that?" he has already made his mind. He is not taking much more crap from this chick. 2:52 is the nugget here. He engages in smalltak with a passerby while the mark hears. Oooh its gotta be embarrassing to be talked about as if a child. Officer Ranger there certainly has had some years to fine tune the technique. He has not even run her docs through, but she says: "I ain't got no attitude, it's [inaudible]". The copper has had enough of this bullsit! This is no way to talk to me, and I will make her angry and scared enough to warrant a taste of ol' sparky here! "mom, the police pulled me over" Right at 3:08 she shit her pants a little, she thought he was pointing a gun at her. And him? Ohhhhh, Triple X there just cum his pants a little as well. The adrenaline, snoopkims. the sweet, sweet adrenaline pumping through his white hot veins! She is scared sitless, and he becomes a finely tuned machine, he remembers the camera (remember to insist, so I don't get called trigger-happy), but he feels his prostate twitching in that wonderful all-familiar way. And then, Shnupkims, sweet, sweet release. That inflamatory bitkh is turned into a smoldering, begging piece of meat, she is finally revealed for what she is! That'll teach her to disobey! You smell that Shnookie? Do you? That is the smell of order restored, piss spilled, and officer no-neck there being nothing less than a god. For a precious few seconds he is king, and she, well, ms. "mom, he is gonna shoot me" there is the quivering piece of trash she was born to be. By now she has lost control. The cops can smell the shit in her pants already. All three of them know she has been stripped of the artificial veil that separates us from the animals. They have to speak loudly now, not to intimidate, really, but to just get through to the epileptic mess before them. Do you hear that S? "I can't, I can't?" Oh, missus, that is not how this fear-loving, I mean, god-fearing, I mean, god-loving system is set up. Sure you can, and I will show you how. See how easy it is? And then, the wailing. Officer vinDiesel there has finished climaxing. He seems a little disconcerted. She is wailing more than he remembered them wailing. Everyone is different, I guess. They all have their little nuances, like a new lover. She is making a scene, the cheeky perp, and even the dogs are noticing. He feels a little embarrassed, but he ignores it. It annoys him. I am doing my job. Textbook. It must be something else I'm feeling. Tell me, #2, are the wires off? She is sure a screamer this one, isn't she? Is that piss #2 is rubbing off his shoes at 4:51? At 5:11 the Law is getting a little hard again. No, it's too soon, isn't it? But she is asking questions. That piece of trash. Look at the comments on you tube, I'm sure some of those went through your head, and through countless other god-fearing law-abiding tax-paying up-standing citizens. How dare the sea-gull-dog-beaten-to-death-trailer-trash question me again? How can she even, after our little connection a second ago? Calm-down, sparky, enough for today. As a trained officer it is my job to explain to this little criminal what it is she did wrong, so that the law is applied like Solomon's very own. Firm, but fatherly and fair. Do you hear, my sweet friend schook? Do you hear the little nugget at 5:17? She will think twice next time she wants to take a swing at an officer of the law, and she better. Tell you what, though, I will certainly think twice before mouthing a cop off. A job well done, peace restored, and freedom upheld. Amen. ahem. got a little carried away. 
The frenzy seems to be more about "see!  this is more validation for what we've been spouting nonstop for the last 6 years!  That's why it's VERY VERY IMPORTANT!!!"  Attempted *and* successful murders happen all the time.  But attempted or successful terrorism?  That golden story just isn't available quite as often, so they've gotta jump on it when they have the chance, and drag it out as much as possible.
All the humans are dead.
I rest my case.
Esta buenismo
Hmmmmm. I thought Adam Corolla was the unwanted celeb.
Both spect and kelmr2003 must not have kids. A large number of schools today require students to wear an ID card around their neck or on their person at all times while on campus. The cards have RFID chips embedded in them and there are scanners at all exterior doors and on busses as well as classroom entranceways have RFID readers. See my above reply about how they're used. In Spring, TX the "movement log" of each student as they get on and off the bus and enter and exit the schools entrances is piped right to a terminal in the towns police station so the local sheriff knows which students get on the bus, exit the bus and come and go from the school doors. A friend has children that go to High School in Peoria, IL. The schools intranet is accessible to parents through a login and is used for absence reporting and monitoring grades, as well as communicating with teachers and checking assignments and homework (teachers report daily on the web what homework has been assigned for their class and when it's due). The kids there also have RFID enabled ID's that they must wear at all times and their entry and exit from classrooms is logged and put on the web site as well. The mom knows what classes her kids go to at all times and when or if they leave the school through any of the exits. Our children are being conditioned to constant monitoring like cattle. All in the name of their safety of course. :) Because, please, won't you think of the children!
reformat... put linux on it... simple as that no need to read the whole thing
God I love Taylor Hanson. Oh wait, Tacoma Narrows.   
I have a copy of Civ 1 and still play it occasionally.   It doesn't work well under XP, though, so I'm thinking of devoting an old PC to DOS so I can play Civ and Quake 1. :-)
The 35-year-old star also divulged that she found out about her abnormality during a dance class.
Sphere? What the hell are you talkin' about, Chief?
Heh heh heh - nerd.
I hear Ron Paul makes a damned fine screwdriver, too.  It's all in how you introduce the ice.  Not a lot of people know that, but Ron Paul does.  Ron Paul.
No matter how many times I read this story, I still love it.
If you draw no lines, they might go out and [marry a box turtle](http://www.boingboing.net/2004/07/18/gay_marriage_compare.html).
Where do the Lisp people fit in here?
I live 2000 miles from Pennsylvania Avenue - does that make me safe?
Oh fuck your stupid.  Read between the lines.  Since you're a retarted fuck, I'll fill in the blanks to my conspiracy theory... The man was looking through ebay at baby pictures and found his baby book.  Since he or the author realized the story regarding a man looking at baby books on ebay is creepy, the fabrication is made that his cousin discovered it.   Now, because you're a retarded fuck, I'll also let you in on another glaringly obvious point - I am being facetious as well.    Christ, is that so fucking hard do discern from the original statement?  Go back to reading your liberal tripe where they spell out every little thing but cleverly hide their bias to make you think how they want you to think, because obviously you cannot figure out what's beyond the print to draw your own conclusion. And oh, this reply isn't any deeper than what I'm saying plainly - that way you can understand it.  I also used words you can understand like 'fuck' and 'retarded'.
They oughta arrest the producers for entrapment and playing with people's fantasies - this show is worse than anything in Paddy Chayevsky's 'Network'
&gt;Correction: Terrorism in the name of the white man is no crime. This has nothing to do with his race.  When we start diverting our attention to such issues we miss that this guy, no matter what the color of his skin, is a terrorist.
The Soviet Union funded their social programs in a spartan manner to move funding to their own military industrial complex in its arms race with the US.  On top of the problems that would normally cause they were also notoriously corrupt being a totalitarian one party rule country.  I would also like to note that most doctors are now making under 100 grand a year after their malpractice insurance and unpaid or underpaid insurance payments for services rendered of course the malpractice suits would have to be addressed as part of any discussions of Universal Health Care which is why lawyers and Dem's will fight Universal.  What costs doctors even more though is having to be paid through insurance companies bureaucracy and having to hire lawyers and clerks to fight to get paid.  All of the money going to insurance companies suddenly went evenly to doctors nurses and hospitals we would not have a funding shortfall and Medicaid would cost less and would work and be funded.  Think about all the money bouncing around insurance companies that pays for paperwork instead of paying for a health care industry.
Would've been cooler if she was on time and got cut off anyway.
That was hilarious. &gt; Alright. Well get lost. Amazing. &lt;3333
Bull. CSS works, has worked, and will work. So much of the bitching and moaning is "waaaaah, it doesn't work exactly the way my tables did, so it must be too hard".
I stopped reading at "oh fuck your stupid".
&gt;First off the taxes on the middle class are high and they basically make it so if you make under 90-80 grand a year your bring home pay is not all that different as someone that makes 30-40. Wait. Wait. Wait. Are you saying that someone who makes $75k a year has take-home pay "basically" not all that different than the take-home pay of someone making $30k?  Could you quantify that a little?
It's a good and fair bunch of observations.  I too live in Canada, and the way things are moving is very much to a two-tiered system.  That being said, we *CAN* elect a real government next time,who isn't pro-bush and pro-business.   And the system we have, while not perfect, is a damn sight better than the US system.  And if you look at Moore's point - it does look close to ideal compared to what the US has.
lol)
Because the rest was too hard to understand.  It's OK, there are places you can get help.
That's exactly what I was thinking. Would've been really easy to just make Cheney's missing piece vaguely in the shape of a heart, etc...
I can't believe I haven't heard of these, I'll look em up right now.
That could be where I'm doing my field work on fishy smells that come from the town center and not from the sea.
So it's not drawn realistically as the title suggests, just a different kind of caricature.
First 'thisisby' I've ever voted up.
ann coulter..... ugh  she makes me as sick as pat robertson, fox news, and yes the entire phelps family
[jquery](http://jquery.com/) makes it all real
Are you saying that his was a loder crap?
A quote for the times.
He makes me write bad checks.
So I looked it up and this is what came up first.  [Fake abortion clinic sues real abortion clinic for not being fake](http://majikthise.typepad.com/majikthise_/2006/09/fake_abortion_c.html)  F-ing Great!
Check this out all you Desert Hearts Fans!  Helen Shaver, Patricia Charbonneau and Alex Macarthur at the reunion party for the classic film Desert Hearts.  They are two of the hottest gals in Lesbian Film history!
from the title it doesnt really seem like whoever submitted the article knew it was a fake.
Do you realize that fluoridation is the most monstrously conceived and dangerous Communist plot we have ever had to face?
Here's a 2002 BBC article confirms what you said indirectly. It deals with Asian influence on their culture: "According to the latest official estimates, British-Indians number almost a million, the British-Pakistani community a further 675,000, Bangladeshi 257,000 and Chinese 149,000. A further 242,000 people have varying Asian backrounds."  http://news.bbc.co.uk/hi/english/static/in_depth/uk/2002/race/asian_britain.stm
Not to mention Tripods.
Kucinich definitely has the aura of one who can think right there on the spot and not just rattle off various bits of his script, and for some reason it seems not to work all that well for him. The system is a total mess, the electorate's powers of discernment is neat to iffy a lot, so the best man can get kept down. However, if all the candidates died, I think kuci could get at least the nomination in that scenario. Don't sell him that short.  
I hear a lot of good things about wicket.  Is wicket the tool to use?  I have been ok with SpringMVC(jsp2.0), but always looking for something lighter.
In the case of the prosecutor-suicide, he never actually committed a crime.  What he did was have a conversation about sex with a Perverted Justice volunteer who was legally of age.  That person may have identified him/herself as a minor, but technically, no minor was solicited. In fact, he did not even seek out the "minor" at the other end of the chat even though a time and place had been set.  The other men show up at the decoy's house, see the decoy, and then stay.  Under these circumstances, I agree that a minor has been solicited (once the predator sees the minor and stays, the identity of the solicited is confirmed to be a minor by the predator and thus the solicitation crime is committed). However, the prosecutor only solicited a sex-laced conversation from an adult on the internet pretending to be a minor--if this is a crime, it must necessarily be a "thought crime" because, for the crime to be committed, the solicitor must imagine reality to be different than it actually is (i.e., imagine he is chatting with a minor) and the solicitee must also suspend reality, pretending to be a minor when he in fact is not.  Furthermore, if his crime consists of merely the written word in the chat box, a law prohibiting the expression of certain ideas of thoughts would fly in the face of the first amendment--and scotus has been consistent in it's protection of the written word. Not that this is relevant, because Hansen and his crew acted as judge, jury, and executioner when they committed themselves to hunting the man in his own home and subjecting him to a televised public shaming.  With or without the imprimatur of the local sheriff, this kind of tar-and-feathering vigilante justice isn't becoming of a nation ruled by law. Scotus should look closely at the constitutionality of the laws upon which these prosecutions are predicated and the accused should challenge their prosecution.
That is old, but still funny
omg. I've dedicated my working life to advancing the cause of the Devil's work in the guise of a homosexual's invention. I feel so dirty.
If they didn't want their privacy invaded, they shoulda thought of that *before* they decided to be terrsts.
Mini-me?
Hmmm... I wonder how she made her sign..
Whenever a newcomer to the internet asks me what *pwned* means I will refer them to this link.
Hi guys! I can get you a *greeeat* deal on [nine year old soda!](http://cgi.ebay.com/Surge-RARE-soda-pop-coke-12-oz-can-Full-Unopened-coke_W0QQitemZ320132657057QQihZ011QQ)
Dude. You can't even *spell* "empirical evidence", let alone understand what it means.
Not very nice, Marve. Bend over let me ream you out with soap.
Wow, it doesn't manage to say a damn thing.
Voted this up, but several C's and D's show the author to be an easy grader (especially in Part 1). 
Kinda fell like the WTC complex
http://reddit.com/info/22gcp/comments/c22hwv
mmm...i love the taste of sour grapes!
Is it just me or is the one with the most notches on her bedpost also the hottest (black straps on the dress, far right in the group montage)? From reading her story, I'd guess it's because: * she got clear and unambiguous information early, and was taught to protect herself * Sex has usually been a pleasant experience for her. * She's part of the elite. (high social status translates into more sex for most vertebrates).   Do notice that she's now in a long term relationship and likes it better that way... 
Thucydides? Look, I don't think the quote's that earth-shattering either, but the dude's in the top two or three dozen most famous people of his millenium. I don't know if anyone alive today will be a member of such an exclusive set.
Bottomline: Jon heap funny fella. Me likey. We watch. Me laugh me ass off. Me feel um good. MSM can go diddle themselves on all sides. The only advantage me give Jon is that he has the "cover" of humor to give him an assist. Otherwise than that, his advantage is owing to the shortfall of the MSM, which has lost it's way, like the 'pukelican party and the no-nuts dems.
Yes, but do you think these extraterrestrial visitors practice maintaining a carbon-neutral lifestyle?
Now why aren't there more prosecutors like that?!?! Huh? That pos in Chapel Hill for example. The only argument against him trying to stop a train with his bare hands is that someone will have to clean up the mess. And you know what, I would do it for the state if they just cover my expenses.
Wouldn't be locally known as *The Suppository* by any chance, would it?
Uh huh huh.  Uh huh huh.  You said "full penetration." Sorry, somebody had to say it.
Only if you bought along imaginary condoms and duct tape, I'd argue.
Clinton is a psychopatic scumbag. So is Dubya.
http://reddit.com/info/22gcp/comments/c22hx4
VERY Valid Points..I have the same probs..its way too overprices for what it does
Look at her flag.
This only works out well if you get in the house and his wife is standing there and she goes, "What the hell took you so long, Jack. I have to use the loo, don't you know. He's upstairs at his computer. When you leave don't slam the door." Then what you have is an accomplice. Makes for bigger news.
Because they *deserve* to be treated rudely! Nice world we live in.
Heh heh heh - now *that's* funny!
Tell you what: when you meet an alien, look me up, and I'll buy you both lunch at a restaurant of your choosing.
The electrode in your brain is working ok.
On point 8 about the GPS position and maps.google.com, does google already let you specify your location as part of a GET request when navigating to their site? I don't see how you can expect the iPhone to accomodate that, and continue to do so via maintenance updates for both google and other mapping services. Thats too much variability for Apple to deal with.
Amen!  The storyline for AC was also great.  I couldn't get enough of it at the time.
&gt;Or look at Gibson and all the trouble he got. And all he did was make a movie based on a book. No matter how you slice it, the Jews killed Jesus, and brag about it. Good for them! Heretics always get it. That's always been my take on it, too.  Poor baby doesn't like being boiled in shit for eternity?  Maybe he shouldn't have said he was the Son of God then, should he? &gt;here it is. Worth watching, but a bit flawed. Thanks.  I'll look for it. &gt;Yes. I was careful to use the word "most", not all. Brent Owens is a favorite of mine, but it is clear the brother really likes to hear himself talk. I liked the movie.  If I had known who the director was, i would have named him too. &gt;In general, the bar is very, very low. Van Peebles's movie demonstrates that -- he grossed at least $4 million dollars, and Van Peebles, not the ususal suspects, kept that money. So he made a fortune off a steaming pile of crap. But it was pro-black, anti-white, long-dick n-word, white-women-fucking, anti-establishment crap. At that time, the novelty of the subject matter was probably enough to ensure success.  Standards are a little higher now, even in the BET ghetto. Even some of the movies from that era weren't bad.  By some weird cosmic coincidence, Coffy happens to be on TV right now, and it's OK.  But the director was white.
Ok I will have to take it back and just think if he won the nom he would easily win the White house.  Sad, so sad.
There's always a danger in trying to be ironic in politics or submitting that irony without preparatory explanation to Reddit: The woman is actually protesting *for* gay rights, and probably more specifically for gay marriage. First, notice that she's holding a rainbow flag.  Second, notice the stickers and pins that say "I agree with the SJC", the SJC being the *Supreme Judicial Court* of Massachusetts which found in favor of gay marriage. So, the comment about Alan Turing is intended to be ironic in the sense that Turing made enormous contributions to fighting Nazism and by extension computing.  Most certainly over the heads of most members of the Religious Wrong and apparently over the heads of some Redditers, too...
snookums!!! your name triggered a flood of memories going back to that heady time when I was called snookums. She was Scandanavian and a bombshell. Ooohlah, halcyon days. Her nick was Erika the Red. ^-^
That's funny....I thought it was founded on the freedom of religion.
I have one and I'm rather disappointed, and this is coming from a big Apple fan.
so wrong
DosBox?
Seperation FROM church and state?  WTF? edit: i've been too crabby lately.  :P
If he always wanted to make this game, what took him so long?  Not enough disk space for cinematics?
It looked like Chirstopher Reeve, circa his first *Superman* movie, modeling at the desk.
&gt;I believe that really happened. Sure.  My money would be on the Panthers.
I only said "at least the nom." In which case there would be a frisson of hope. Springs eternal, though. :)
Since you've never heard this before you must be a newcomer to the internet, yourself.
Rather "Don't..........Stop!"
In a similar style, [this guy](http://eaglelander3d.com/) created a simulator for the Apollo missions.
Now, we have Giuliani's guys using 500g of cocaine and Romney's are sick and twisted. Okay McCain it's your turn. ...Make it good!
Hey man, don't you go dissing Surge.
The guy was a general in the war between Athens and Sparta.  What have you ever done?
o sorry.  simple mistake.
Please.  This has been done to death.  Much ink has been spilled listing all of Michael Moore's lies - and half-lies. My personal favorite example was from "Bowling for Columbine".  He showed the famous campaign commercial from George Bush Sr. that criticized Michael Dukakis for allowing convicted murderers to take weekend leave.  (The Willie Horton ad).  But Moore altered the ad!  He spliced in the caption "Willie Horton released. Then kills again" and made it look like part of the original ad!  Then he spliced in "paid for by the Bush-Quayle campaign" to make Bush look like a racist. Those anti-Moore sites are there for a reason.  Most of the criticisms they have of Moore are legitimate.
Shame on the assholes who have no class. Corolla has no class and no balls. In facing Ann Coulter, he would have been humiliated.  
that family has an army load of skeletons in the closet
Indeed it is  classic. Gotta love kids.  here is one equally as funny. Except this one is script kiddie http://www.frihost.com/forums/vt-51466.html
&gt;Oh well, taking a page from the Jew's handbook, I guess the Osama movie will have to make the neo-cons out to be like Nazis. Then it will all be OK when they do the terrorism, right? Not if it's financed by oil-rich guys with funny-looking headgear.  Like Mel Gibson, they could go outside the usual distribution channels. But if any mainstream movie glorifies terrorism, it will certainly be leftists fighting against Bushitler, with Rage Against the Machine (or whatever pseudo-rebellious corporate rock the kids like these days) playing in the background.
I am so sick of this bullshit. What a completely dumbass article. Seriously, no SERIOUSLY, if they really have to play 6 degrees like this to find some sort of "dirt" on the guy, what the fuck are we waiting for? Make him president already because it sounds like he'd be the ONLY one that would be in there not for special interests or his own. (and they are PROOVING it by crap like this) Isn't that what the fuck we have been wanting?  I'd say Mitt or Paul or Gravel all the way. So far the media out there, both MSM and tabloid blogs seem to have quite a love for Mitt as they seem to want to prove there isn't really anything of substance to worry about with the very worries we have been worried about for years and years with the vast majority of screw up presidents we have had!  Get your heads out of your asses and realize that this article and the dog one is pretty much tabloid quality tripe! I mean dammit man, my Uncle was part of the hells angels. Does that exempt me from ever running for the presidency? How about you? What "attachments" do you have that could be used against you like this. Apparently it could be anything!  Next we will hear that he *gasp!* drank a coke once and it's against his religion (although wrong).
RIP thread.  We'll miss you.
Prove it. Show me one site with a resizable three-column layout that isn't broken. Of course, that is the bare minimum to be a contender. For CSS to actually replace tables for laying out columns, you have to prove it is actually better in some measurable way.  What bothers me is you anti-table people are so stupid. Why replace a perfectly good solution like tables with CSS when tables are tivial to use and produce better results?  Its like you belive that as soon as you start using tables you have to stop using CSS. 
I'd rather play Spore. Too bad it won't be out til 2088.
For those complaining about the accuracy of this map, keep in mind it is from the point of view of a single cartographer. Back then, cartographers had many different ideas of what places looked like and how big they were. They also had limited information to go on when making maps.They couldn't just pull up Google Maps and copy down what they saw. Heck, most probably had never seen 99.9% of the places drawn on their maps.
WHAT????   I never knew that Kenny's parents were [Ash and Misty](http://www.geocities.com/daniel_barinas/Misty_Ash.gif)!
I expect the iPhone to be much like OSX was...pretty, but not very functional at .0, improvements at .1, usable at .2, and really ready at .3. At least, that was my experience with OSX. I'm looking forward to the updates.
He says no AIM (AOL Instant Messenger), but iChat on the Mac does AIM. Doesn't the iPhone version?
&gt; If new software created the old format by default, you might have a point. Your argument doesn't make sense. Why would I want to use software that, by default, deactivated the new features?  If I didn't want the new features, I probably wouldn't have bought the new version in the first place. 
Of course it doesn't.  I got unlimited power even *without* that.
Saw it after my comment, on a second look at the pic. oh the irony.
&gt;they really have to play 6 degrees Where by "6", you mean "1".
yep, that's why I put the headline I did. It shows a shift in attitude away from "Google's users come first and it's our job to empower them, and that lets us sell ads." to "Google's users are sheep and ours to fleece." And to all the bozos whinging on about marketing just doing their job... way to completely miss the point.
&gt; Our children are being conditioned to constant monitoring like cattle. This issue has been a *constant* point of contention between myself and a family member who currently serves as director of health &amp; safety for the school district I graduated from.  I, being your typical commie liberal hippie reddit-reader, have had basically the same opinion as you ever since he proposed a Peoria-style system for the district....in **1996**. "Get 'em while they're young, before they have any inkling that they have certain inalienable rights" was my response at the time and today. He, the typical school-administration bureaucrat, claims that students have "too many rights," that the school *doesn't have enough authority* over the students, and that the Peoria system should be implemented statewide (New York). Makes family gatherings rather heated when he gets talkin' about work.
Raises issues?  Um, no.  These issues have always existed. Recommended:  http://www.amazon.com/Transparent-Society-Technology-Between-Privacy/dp/0738201448/
I meant surveillance organized by a single agency without public accountability. If everyone has a camera, you can do PR warfare- you expose footage to retaliate for me exposing footage. When a single agency controls enough cameras to see everything, there's no counterbalance.
I continually think the final stop on the last refuge whistle tour has occurred, but once again, I have been proven wrong.
Um, Sid?  My wife has a few things she wants to say to you.  You're gonna need this shield...
You're right.  Nothing about % of GDP (2x OECD average, 17% of GDP). Nothing about % spent on administration. As you point out; these stats are widely available. Yet nothing gets done. So it's probably the best idea not to trot those out; apparently they dont convince people.
I checked out Inositol on the net because it sounded really good. Unfortunatly the writer of the article missed this important point Enemy of inositol -   Coffee kills this nutrient. http://www.anyvitamins.com/inositol-info.htm so much for any benefits from it being in red Bull.
The guys who rammed the car into the airport.
http://www.wikiprotest.com/index.php?title=Main_Page It is a wiki site jackass, with a blog too.
Seems like quite a few military men and [many, many others](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Witness_accounts_of_the_Roswell_UFO_incident)  believe in the [Roswell story](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Roswell_UFO_crash): Lieutenant Walter Haut's colleague, Major Jesse Marcel,  persistently claimed to have seen the crash site(s) and evidence of non-terrestrial artifacts. His son, Jesse Jr also claimed to have seen and handled artifacts that his father had bought home from the crash sites. [Lt Colonel Corso](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Philip_J._Corso) wrote *'The Day After Roswell'* detailing his involvement in the reverse-engineering of artifacts from the Roswell crash. Corso's family also claimed their father's story was fact and not fiction.  Awful lot of smoke if there was no fire.
Sorry about the lack of sources, I was hoping someone who knew would contribute that.
This is a really embarrassing use of the word "cool".  "Hey son, would you like to see my cool new URI?  Hasn't changed in 87 years."  It's silly.  Berners-Lee is saying that with a little forethought, you can cement all your furniture to your floor as soon as possible.  Stability is a nice idea, but there's a cost to keeping things in the same place forever.
I found a lot of evil mi*key mouses that are watching over everything and pulling out wires on Youtube LOL!
&gt;I think candidates on either side should get free airtime. Why stop there! Shouldn't health care be free as well? And food, water, clothing, housing, transportation, energy, telephones, etc., etc. The only reason they aren't is because "the rich" are greedy, right? IF YOU SUPPORT A CANDIDATE, SEND HIM/HER MONEY FOR HIS CAMPAIGN LIKE I DO!
nope, that would be what is called a "reference" to a particular game that happens to be also now coined as a phrase shall I point you to the dictionary of the word "reference"?  Sometimes in that game, you could play 6 degrees to X using  fewer steps. Honestly, what is your point? If it is what it looks like, what does it really matter? Or was it just to be a smart-ass? How about this? Who do you know? Do you know everything about who you know? How about who they know or what they have done? Well if not, and you plan on running for public office, apparently if the other candidates have the MSM or "sources" in their pockets and the brain dead blog posters out there posting tabloid crap like this, you have no chance either.  Do you get the 6 degree part in this context now sweetheart?   
Probably not any of us to be bluntly honest. That includes you, contratian. The wa the 21st century is starting off I doubt -anyone- in it will make any of those 2-3 dozen most famous.
faggot.
Not if you keep them out of the neo-Panopticon public school system and opt for home-schooling, or [free schooling](http://albanyfreeschool.com/).
I think she is being sarcastic... I think...
The interesting thing about these gripes (most of which seem valid, although not all of which bother me) is that they're almost all addressable through software updates.  The way Apple handles the software updates over the next couple of months will indicate how much they stand behind this product.
There was a bug in the CPU. It was fixed at the OS level.  Wow, real riviting news. What's next week, Linus is hungry and eats and sandwitch?
&gt; These are not terrorists, and they do not frighten me. They most certainly are terrorists. L00s3r terrorists, but terrorists nonetheless.  Really, if we must have terrorists, let them be the kind that throw a hissy fit and accidentally set themselves on fire.
Perhaps we could kick everyone who posts an outraged comment off reddit. Wait, they might be being ironic. Damn.
This is pretty old.  More like Web 1.99 [beta].
iPhone Day was both an inflection point in the development of lifestreaming and a lesson for brand makers -- exposure is there for the taking. Metarand explores the nuances...
&gt;Schools exist to mold and conform students to a certain way of thinking, and impart a set of values on them. At least that's their primary goal. Wrong. That's actually what the parents are supposed to do. Or, at least, *were* supposed to do.
There's no iChat on the iPhone.  There's only SMS, which happens to use an iChat-like interface.
HEHEHEHEHEHE LOOOLZ This bitch deserved it, how can such a moron talk, yeah alright freedom of speech, in your butt Ann
*groans*. This certainly doesn't look good on us pro-life people, I can tell you that. There are raving loons in *every* organazation. The ones in my camp include this guy and Ann Coulter. People like him may be the reasons even totally peaceful anti-abortion clinic pickets and demonstrations get banned - totally.
Pure politics and nothing else.  This will go absolutely no where. The Democrats know they will not win this in court.  Even if the Democrats changed their minds and actually seriously pursued this, it would take longer than Bush's term.  This is red meat for the Democratic looney left and nothing more.  But, this kind of inside the beltway political infighting is hated by the moderate and independent swing voters, so I hope the Democrats keep on going.
&gt;Stock Images Collection. Need royalty-free stock images for your next web design or desktop publishing project? Turn to Wikimedia Commons, where you can browse images by subject, licence, or author. And under [Category:People](http://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/Category:People), there's a whole [Kevin Rose](http://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/Category:Kevin_Rose) subcategory.  How cool is that?
&gt;Hansen and his crew acted as judge, jury, and executioner  Sounds like the guy acted as his own executioner. (I know, that was terrible.) I see your point about his being at least a lesser crime, if it was one. Had it been an actual minor on the other side of the connection, it's still inappropriate, but not *nearly* the same thing as actually showing up with condoms.  Dateline is being completely tacky by airing these shows, but I would disagree that they're completely at fault. Perverted Justice has been working with police to catch online pervs for a long time, NBC is just profiting by taping it. Which is still pretty prurient and sensationalist. Just the way we like our "news," right?
And gets funding for fancy military toys.
If you ever have the opportunity to take a college-level education course, I highly recommend it. &gt; mold[ing] and conform[ing] students to a certain way of thinking, and impart[ing] a set of values on them is explained to be the purpose of education fairly early on. As kevinballa said, the actual subject matter of classes is just a byproduct. They never told us this in grade school.
It's his show and he can do what he wants.
Sure since the tax rates start going up steeply for anyone making over 40k or so and the major tax breaks dont start until over 100k and actually from what I understand from sources I am not sure to trust 100k-200k get pretty hosed as well compared to people above them in funds, on a percentage basis of course.  But what really hurts these tax brackets are local, state and land taxes that have went up over the last few years as the federal government pulled back its funding from programs.  Meanwhile housing and land prices are booming and that would be good for people that were selling before it stalled but for those owning that land in many states they now just have to pay phenomenal tax bills.  Of course I am figuring this as a percentage mostly because people tend to choose the american dream in their price range ie big check big house big car, bigger check bigger house bigger car which takes money from investment of course this is their choice to live this large in an unstable economy and some follow more wise paths but most follow the pre-packaged american dream concept and therefore *extra* or investment money is often very close to nothing, admitedly by there own fault for those making above 40-50k a year.  My point was more about how little money the current tax system allows for investment from the *middle classes* due to stacking taxes in a manner to keep you in I got a raise, ouch how did I lose money land which most of us wage slaves have been living in since what WWII?
Right, but according to [this](http://www.mfa.gov.il/MFA/History/Modern%20History/Israel%20at%2050/The%20Health%20Care%20System%20in%20Israel-%20An%20Historical%20Pe), Israel also has socialized healthcare.
Common sense departed from the task of school administration a long time ago.
I don't really even want to know...
9. 9 things that suck but can be fixable via software.
Unwanted? She was invited on the show.
Eminem's flow is most definitely similar.  Hip-hop, generally, I don't think so.
Sorry about the foot lice. That was my bad.
Please STOP MANGLING [THIS QUOTE!](http://en.wikiquote.org/wiki/Benjamin_Franklin) Those who would give up Essential Liberty to purchase a little Temporary Safety, deserve neither Liberty nor Safety.
Interesting issue.  What should you do if your father makes a fortune through illegal and immoral means and you inherit it?
This is awesome
The nice thing about Arimaa is that you can play it with a chess board and pieces. Just radically different rules.
It was. The first colonists were fleeing severe persecution in England (the famous Mayflower brigade). How well did they succeed? Pretty well at first. But technology in the late 19th century and into the present day advanced faster than our moral foundations could hold. The result? Ads that would have rightly been labeled porn, teens pregnant by the thousands, and a world that hates us partly because *the whole frickin' U.S. is X-rated from sea to shining sea.* It isn't even safe to take my younger siblings to the local mall anymore - Godd--- stupid 'Victoria's Secret' ads!!!
Wow, you're just brimming with invective. My point was that he's significantly closer to Romney than is typically implied by "they have to play 6 degrees to get to him".  What did you think my point was? Honestly, your rebuttal here is just silly.  "You could play 6 degrees to X using fewer steps"? Please.   That is, by *far*, the absolute weakest sense of the popular phrase, and if it's honestly what you meant, you should've just said "this man is not Mitt Romney", thus not opening yourself up to -- ahem -- "misinterpretation" based on the apparent implication inherent in your phraseology.
Hell, even the 90s weren't this bad. At least not 'til those assholes at Columbine screwed the pooch for all of us. I praise Joe Pesci every day that I got out three months before 9/11.
feynman's a beast
Ever heard of the terms 'Microsoft Works' and 'Military Intelligence'? Hint: look up oxymoron.
These are very cool lights
I don't see why it's implausible that they should be human.  It's an obvious form for intelligent, tool-making life.  Two hands because one can't do much and more than two require too much brainpower.  Two legs for roughly the same reasons, and a head to hold the CPU (although it's not obvious to me why the head should be where it is). Has anybody seriously thought about plausible designs for intelligent, tool-using lifeforms?  Not mobile bugs like the framsticks you posted, but actual intelligent life.  Maybe the design space is more constrained than you think. One thing we know is that there are lots of different designs that have been tried on earth, not all of them vertebrates, and the only ones that "did it" are 2-armed bipeds.
God damn, that's how I want to go out, pantsing the idiots of the world.
I think she's been treated a lot more nicely than the soldiers that she URGED to go to Iraq and whom receveid bullets in their head. I won't even talk about Iraqi deaths Would be nice if she can come to the show and the guy slaped her in the face, so she can wake up from her stupid agenda
The father is a successful businessman (apparently).  They live in a great house.  They have lots of family to help them thru life.  They have protective, successful role models.  They organize and share responsibility amongst themselves.  These kids are learning lessons every day about independence, interdependence, success, hard work, family, and society that rivals the best practical education on the planet.   These people are not selfish or irresponsible; they are merely people.  People who love their children and are willing to go to the lengths necessary to treat them well.   We need MORE people like this in the world, not less.
I think *you* may be dissing Surge if you drink a nine year old bottle...
Hello, can anyone read? "it made me realize what an apt metaphor the missing puzzle piece can be. Even if you simplify the concept, it can be quite effective" And I agree it's quite effective. Maybe you don't agree, but the author did explain.
Ann Coulter? Very Yes.
&gt; You probably know Wikipedia as the world’s largest encyclopedia, suitable for research on most any topic. No.  No I don't.  It is not suitable for research in any way.  It is often biased and wrong.  You may as well use graffiti for your research.
I think [he did](http://reddit.com/info/1xcgl/comments/c1xg1f) ([vs.](http://www.google.com/search?q=fruitbat%27s+law+of+irony&amp;ie=utf-8&amp;oe=utf-8&amp;aq=t&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;client=firefox-a)).  Funny as hell, though.  Consider that meme *spread*.
The best website for Individuals and groups to find Free information about Free Medical Clinics and Free Dental Clinics, free dental, free dentist, free dentistry, free medical care, free medical help, free dental help, free healthcare, free Health service, free mental health, dental care, All Over USA
The grandchildren of #73 were some horny beasts!  5 kids with an average of 9+ kids each!
So Romney knows someone who is involved with a teens camp program that has been reputed to .... and so on.
Supreme court emergency session on Tuesday.
Oh yeah...tricky Apple GUI designers!
google maps does let you specify lat/long in a GET request.
If they don't have musketeers, or at the very least pikemen, they're just begging to get pwn3d.
Whiney asshole who still hasn't gotten over a congressional vote from 14 years ago!  Nothing wrong with him that a girlfriend wouldn't cure.
If Richard Feynman isn't one of your heroes, you're probably not very interesting.
And thank you to governor (and Presidental candidate) Bill Richardson for doing his part to erode the war on drugs  by signing this.
&gt;(And your habit of separating the question mark from its sentence really is annoying ;-)) Sorry, I write way too much code :)
73 and 61 having parents who were slaves and knew Lincoln, respectively, is just mind boggling. Edit: Fucking, hell, just leave it to reddit to twist a simple statement into a political one.
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
Actually, I expect more from google. You're taking the baseline and saying it should be the goal.  Let's apply a little google style innovation to something really basic and boring in the medical field, blood chemistry profiles. _this is just one way to innovate on this level not the One True Way_ Currently blood chemistry profiles are done in an only partially automated way, cost a lot, and are not interpreted in a standard format nor matched to outcomes. Google could use it's resources to: * drive an industry consortium to produce a fully automated testing lab in a box, that connects to googles network for analysis and results.  * make the results available in summary and complete versions so that doctors and patients can see what is. * use the collected data matched against other medical records to link outcomes and causes, so that signals of problems can be detected and the patients and their doctors can be notified. * do the above three steps in an incrementally improving iterative style; so that even if the first gen blood scanners aren't as good as an expert lab tech they still provide a useful datapoint. Something like that.
Sorry to interject here, but what makes him a Republican? I don't really have anything bad to say about Michael Moore, but I certainly refuse to jump on the Michael Moore worshipping bandwagon. I guess that makes me a Republican too? Republican. Democract. Republican. Democrat. Blah. Blah. Blah. They're the same damn thing.
finally!
Wow, this is incredible. Good find!
While it's all too predictable that "human rights activists [would] want it to move farther and faster", the article doesn't make it clear when and how the proposed new anti-torture probe is intended to be brought out and enjoyed...
"I could not concentrate on what this old man was saying..."
I agree, however Ragtime is a great, great, great grandparent of Hip-Hop.  Jazz, Be-Bop, Funk.... the evolution of music is fascinating.
thanks for catching that. Its supposed to be pulling that page from the same server. Its a very small hello world kinda html only page to test that as well. I fixed the code 
Couldn't you use meebo in safari?
Yea, sorry I'm running a little late...
I feel less secure knowing that government goons are recording my activities - and MAD that I'm paying for it all!
Oh, yeah? If he was so smart, then why is he so dead?
nicely distilled
Keep that list handy for yourself...
And tomorrow $7.15 will buy the same that $5.15 buys today.  The only thing that will have happened is that those who cannot understand simple economics will have been duped into voting for their manipulators while at the same time losing their jobs to Mexico.
Ann Coulter has balls, if you interested in asserting the positive.
If healthcare didn't cost so much, nobody would need insurance to begin with. Why does healthcare cost so much, you ask? Government intervention. What will happen when the government takes *complete* control of it (as opposed to the 60% or so they have their hands in now)? The prices will continue to skyrocket. But by that time, nobody will care because everyone will have "free" health care. As long as they aren't paying for it, who cares how much it costs, right?
That's just in time for a concurrent release with Duke Nukem Forever, and they'll both be playable only on The Phantom console.
What's the difference between this and Civ 4?
I am constantly exhausted by people who think religion belongs in government. Look no further than Iran for a shining example of the kind of thing that leads toward.
go back to digg, you tosser
Right...and kids aren't hyperactive when given sugar. Neither that statement or this article will fly with any experienced mother. Or with me for that matter - I should know, having accidently set a carton of eggs in the garage.  And also gave my kid brother half a king-size snickers when he was five.  ~.~ neither of those had good results.
Letterman did a good number on her too.
Ironic, yes, but it doesn't change the point, which is that stable URIs need a long-term namespacing structure. Just for good humor, though:  http://web.archive.org/web/20070701031819/http://www.money.com/money/moneydaily/1998/981212.moneyonline.html Le sigh.
Agreed, particularly when that evolution occurs from a succession of seemingly disparate cultures.
FTA&gt;  ....  "greediest and most ungrateful generation." ... Good description of babyboomers, but I would add conceited to the description.
Guilt by association, eh? I don't disagree that it's often reasonable to judge a man by the company he keeps, but the posted head is still misleading. &lt;i&gt;Romney&lt;/i&gt; is not linked to these abuses, other than via his employment of someone linked to them. There's not even any proof that he was aware of this crap...just the insinuation that the "should have been," which may or may not be true, but isn't provable in any event.
&gt; Q: Roughly how old is the earth? Most were wrong but at least they were all well over a million...
Hobo meat.
In other words, no battles.
for god's sakes man, if you say something like that, leave some [link love](http://www.hgk.mil.tr/haritalar_projeler/tarihi_har/images/03_piri_dunya.jpg)
From the article: &gt;In chess, each player has on average between 25 and 35 possible moves; the average number of moves in Go is more then 250  &gt;In Go, a move early in the game can affect the passage of play hundreds of moves later. If true, wouldn't that make it far too complex for a brute force approach? I don't see how you could scale a computer to test that number of possibilities in any reasonable amount of time. You can only get circuits so small, and electricity can only travel through those circuits as a certain speed. Actually, isn't this is kind of problem that quantum computing is meant to solve?
This is 'news'? Ask a victim of an eminent domain law - aka legalized theft. People have been fighting the government since a bunch of hick farmers got steamed at a tax on their moonshine! That was hardly even a few years after the American Revolution! Talk about discovering the obvious.
Oh!!! You are the ultimate Bitch  Boy! All kneel and worship.
I would argue that this is a big deal, especially since America cares about it's supreme image so much, but I guess not among the scientific world anymore. I'm plainly dissapointed that there's money for an unwanted internationl occupation and not enough for domestic growth in innovation and education, though many would argue that our gov't prefer us to be uneducated and igorant. And it's for reasons like this that I don't vote for my current jerk of a representative Dana Rohrabacher.
I find it incredibly frightening how he died and under what circumstances...when the beloved comic book giant Marvel starts making predictions in the spirit of *1984*...be afraid. Be VERY afraid.
Health as a for-profit business seems to be unethical.  I thought I was staunch libertarian until I agreed with this point of view, but its true.  As Moore has been pointing out in interviews (Larry King, John Stewart) you would not expect or want the Fire Department to make a profit - no, we're not going to put THAT fire out, its too far across town, we'll lose money - so why do we allow THIS life or death business to be based on profit?  Makes sense to me.  Even Ron Paul, when talking about this issue, said back in the day, the hospitals he worked in would simply TREAT indigent patients, there was (and is) really no way to tell who is insured most of the time.  But rather than turn around and try to charge the government 110% of normal care cost, they just ate it, because t here was no-one to charge.  Seems like the "partially" socialized care is the problem, because once you have a guaranteed 'payor' you have no reason not to crank up the prices and make your stockholders incredibly wealthy (if not healthy and wise, apologies to Ben Franklin).  The Health Care Government teat is being milked just like the Secondary Education one; I challenge anyone looking at the plain unbiased numbers for cost change since the 50's to come to another conclusion.  And by the way this conclusion does not mean I favor the abolishment of the partially socialized medicine we now have, but rather favor the expansion of the system for the good of all Americans.
Everyone always talks about Moore having bias, but have you guys ever written a thesis before?  You don't fill your entire paper up with arguments that may disprove your thesis, you write about the things that will support it.  There are always arguments against something, however, sometimes that arguments for it are stronger than the ones against it.  Moore does not have to always put up weak arguments against his strong ones, as it is a waste of time and energy. Seriously, I'd like to see some of you guys talking about bias write a paper that contains 50/50 arguing for and against your subject.  It would be a total mess and if you submitted it to a decent college, you would fail.
&gt;Gordon Brown is openly pro-NWO   .... *what?*
I don't seem to recall Elton John ever writing a song about 'Dingleberry Wine'
The point was, in case it eluded you, that Clinton's charge was totally bogus. 1) I have no problem with attorneys who were political appointees being fired for political reasons. Whether hired and fired by Clinton or Bush - for any reason at any time. 2) But not as bad as Webster Hubbell appointed by Clinton as associate attorney general. Hubbell, in 1994, pleaded guilty to federal mail fraud and tax evasion charges connection with his handling of billing at the Rose Law Firm, a firm with partners that once included Hillary Clinton and Vince Foster. 3) Since a "cronie" is a close friend or companion how does that describe the Supreme Court Justices that were nominated by the President and confirmed with the "advice and consent" of the Senate? Were they lifelong friends or in business together? Clintons appointees fit the definition of cronie. Bush's cronies, well not so clear on that.
We're all headed there, sir.
Do you understand the idea of marginal tax rates? When you get a pay raise from, say, making $30k per year to making $60k, even if you get into a higher tax bracket, your income is not ALL taxed according to that bracket, only the amount of income over the lower end of the bracket.  In other words, if you make $100k, you are taxed a certain percentage for your first so many dollars, then another percentage for the next so many.
the title should read:   Roswell "officers" "amazing" deathbed "admission" raises "possibility" that "aliens" DID "visit"
Which is currently stacked with 30 years of Republican appointees + Ginsberg &amp; Breyer. Fancy that!
Unfortunately, this is far from a "reputed to". http://www.wwaspsinfo.net/
I didn't get that, I got that they think it has economic value, which it does not.
Stewart is a parasite.  He sees an audience with a grudge and he feeds it.  It's that simple.
Ive always thought to know a place you have to live and work there for awhile
I'm curious to see if they screw it up as badly as the Canadian federal gov't did (going to great lengths to grow it in sekrit underground chambers and winding up with, well, crap).  I mean, hell, if Canada can't get it right...
Devil Homos can be sarcastic?
you wouldn't happen to be a resident of a particular Schenectady suburb, now, would you?
that song is the hottest hit ever
Man, I really want that to be an allusion to Arrested Development...
Yeah, I'm all about reverting back to the days of charity hospitals for the poor.  You know, the ones with vermin all over the floor, where doctors would go straight from autopsies to pelvic exams of pregnant women.  That would be AWESOME.
Street vendors every 10 feet selling it for 'medical' uses to perfectly healthy teens by 6:00 AM on that Sunday.
Can Visa rule the world transaction industry through soccer? maybe so
&gt; Kenny's mom is hot, I'd totally do her. I think that's why she keeps popping out babies..
&gt;Perhaps we should celebrate the sesquicentennial by just giving it back... Would it not confound our critics to witness an American act of pure altruism?  Hmm, nope, that would not surprise them. Making a symbolic gesture that accomplishes and costs nothing, and then making a big deal about it. Nope, wouldn't surprise me in the least.
Ever been to Canada? They've all got beady little eyes, and flopping heads so full of lies..
Good point. It's sad that it's taken this much abuse by government officials before the American public has started to see just how little their interests are being served.
This is garbage, total garbage. If you are going to link Romney to torture, there are much more direct connections that have appeared over the last month. 1: During one of the Republican debates, Mitt Romney said he wants [more torture of terrorists and wants to have more Guantanamo Bays.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=I0U9k7Jj_40) 2: Mitt Romney [tortured his dog](http://wonkette.com/politics/dept%27-of-let.s-get-freaky-like-abu-ghraib/mitt-romney-swears-those-abu-ghraib-prisoners-enjoyed-it-273682.php).
&gt;"...lawmakers would look back to their districts, rather than to Washington and the White House, for guidance on how to vote." Wow.  What a concept.
NEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEERRRDDDSS!!
Wikipedia editors really piss me off. They are necessary on one level, but on another seem to see themselves as the gatekeepers that protect their Wikipedia from the unwashed masses.  I hate the thought that some anonymous geek with nothing else to do is deciding what is important enough to be placed on Wikipedia. There has been a few times when I've followed a link to Wikipedia only to discover the page has been deleted. Someone has decided that the topic that I am interested in is so unimportant to them that it isn't worth the few kilobytes of space it is taking up.
a sexy, sexy beast
Well, I'm speechless ... ... ... ... ... "Just what do you think you're doing, Dave?"
And who will pay for it all in the light of the fact that well-paying jobs are being shipped off overseas by the hundreds of thousands?! Many hands make light work and fat wallets, but few hands make heavy work and flat wallets.
Has anyone else seen the movie adaptation of Harrison Bergeron? Remember Eugene Levy's president in that movie? Yeah.
He hasn't actually been killed off ever since they brought him back to life after he was "dead" for a whole season. That I know of...I lost track of the show a while ago.
The statistics don't lie.  Other countries have better health care outcomes than the United States, even after adjusting for socioeconomic factors.  Apparently, when everyone has the same service, it CAN be shitty (like in the Soviet Union), or it can be better than what we have here.
The majority of his complaints are common with all cell phones. Not being able to use the phone as a modem is a common carrier lock in. They want you to pay for their (expensive) data service.  As is not being able to transfer files via bluetooth. Under the auspices of preventing piracy the majority of carriers prevent users from transferring anything via bluetooth. The reality is they just want to be able to charge you for each photo/audiofile/whatever that you send. Really, I'm sure many of the limitations were requirements dictated by AT&amp;T. It's unfortunate that Apple caved to them but did anyone really expect otherwise?   
No... it's just our leader is a stupid coward.
I got an A-, so I feel like an idiot.  ^^;;
non-conspirists modded you down
Well, for instance, Ron Paul opposes all forms of single payer healthcare, the thing this thread is about!
There may be good stuff here, but the rate of information transfer is too slow. I couldn't wait for them to get to the point.
Here comes Stone Phillips!  Scatter!
&gt; We need MORE people like this in the world, not less. Well, there are certainly more of them *now*. But how do you deal with the fact that polygamy means that most males never get married? What is your solution for this? This is, in its core, a winner-takes-all system for males.   
We've definitely disagreed in the past--but this is a totally legit claim.  Mitt Romney is about as morally bankrupt as they  come, and that's a claim you can make purely based on what we know about his opinions.  This article is a bit of an obscure stretch to be making.  Can't we focus on Romney's personal flaws, rather than his obscure associations?
I've always been interested in this guy.  I bought two of his books a few years back but never got to them.  I think I will now.
Duh!! After the left bitches chewed 'em alive for saying the formal military combat part of the war was over, I'm sure they went out of their way to avoid further crap! The guy on the video is so full of himself ... what did he ever do to defend the USA? Reddit is such a leftist whore device I'm surprised the servers still satisfy clients.
Deadliest 5 months since the occupation began, but who's counting.  -_-
Apparently there is a fine line, betwixt irony and sarcasm.
I look into the faces of my very own mortality.
1. Who cares if its not enforced, which I'm sure we would hear about if it were? Its like those stupid old laws not allowing you to kiss your wife on Sunday. Who cares? 2. Wasn't it founded on the idea that the state would not interfere with the church, not vice versa? [not being American, I could be wrong about this]
Are you on this planet? I mean really. Empirical results in other systems and all that. Do those mean anything to you?
I just saw Roger Waters perform Dark Side the other day--for the second time--it was amazing as always.
"What magic wand will allow us to spend less on health care but have no scarcity?" This is a really good question, actually, in spite of the downmods. There is an answer, though, if you do really want to listen. Let's say I have no insurance.  One day, I wake up and my throat feels scratchy.  Whatever, I think, after all, I can't afford to go to a doctor.  I go about my business.  While I am at work (because I can't take sick time without a doctor's note, and I can't afford the doctor's fee), I infect three of my co-workers with what turns out to be a rather nasty respiratory bug. The next day, I have to spend at home, I'm coughing too much to even try to go in to work.  I still don't go to the doctor, though.  I drink a lot of fluids and have chicken soup.  It doesn't help.  I can't go to the doctor.  They'll want payment up front.  I don't have it. The next day, my mother comes to visit and realizes I'm severely dehydrated and am having difficulty breathing.  She phones 911 and I am transported by ambulance to the emergency room, where they must treat me by law regardless of my ability to pay.  My co-workers end up in much the same situation. In this case, simple preventative care would have only cost the amount of a single doctor's visit and a cheap antibiotic prescription.  Instead, it ends up as at least one person's visit to the emergency room.  Emergency care is often ten times more expensive to deliver than equivalent care in a clinic setting (in other words, even for the exact same problem at the same point in its progression, it can cost 10 times as much, and if you let a disease advance further the costs go up more). Preventative medicine is a great way to make medical costs go down by a lot.  One of the big complaints I see from folks in socialized healthcare systems is that mothers take their children in for any little cough or sniffle.  To me, that sounds like a good thing.  I've seen too many people avoid doctors and preventative treatments because they couldn't afford it, and end up in the emergency room in life-threatening situations because of it.
Missed it? _Missed_ a 2-year-old news story? My God...I feel so unobservant! Seriously, man. This happened in late 2005. http://www2.ljworld.com/news/2005/dec/06/mirecki_treated_after_roadside_beating/?ku_news Also, does it make a lot of sense to demean an entire religion on the basis of stupid actions by a couple of fringe adherents? I mean, Fred Phelps claims to be a Christian, too, but no one I know takes the man seriously.
Here's an almost contemporary (1513) and a far more controversial one:  http://www.uwgb.edu/dutchs/PSEUDOSC/PiriRies.HTM It does have a [wikipedia page](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Piri_Reis_map), but the above link debunks some of the more outrageous claims (and has transformed projections we can understand).
I think Bush plays along.
&gt;The suit alleges that teens were locked in outdoor dog cages... But were those cages strapped to the roofs of station wagons?
Cool. I have an old diesel Jetta. Can I modify the engine compartment to take one of these babies? I guess I'll have to strengthen the transmission a skosh, too.
Ok, there is **no** poll here that says anything of the sort. This headline is delusional at best and an outright lie at worst. It's like reddit becomes retarded on the weekends. I guess I'll go outside or something now...
Hmm I wonder what those idiots over at dailykos who ridiculed the response over the london car bombs are saying now? Shame on them and on the reddit users who upmodded that garbage article.
His blog post helps other people decide whether or not they should buy an iPhone. Moreover, getting "all pissy about it" makes it more likely that these problems get fixed in the future.
*snicker* Well, THAT was probably the most laughably ineffectual attempt to discredit an argument you cannot refute that I've seen in a long time Congratulations! Keep up the good work, soldier! *giggle*
Where did you get the statistic 90.0% of people rather give up their toothbrush than their cell phone? You'd think people would change their minds after a week of dealing with all that bad breath.
Yes, this, or in the case of Anne Coulter, a punch in the either of the ovaries. Assuming, of course, she's not a man.
Lobotomy was very popular back then for anything from sexual promiscuity (diagnosed as "clinical nymphomania") to public drunkenness.  Basically, if you had a family member you felt was embarrassing, a lobotomy made sure they would never bother you again. A nice chapter in American history.  Today we take bothersome children and fill them up with amphetamines for their "attention deficit disorders."  We're much more enlightened now.
What do you think I am, a nerd?
That would make a great submission of its own.
Egg WHITES don't have to be refrigerated but egg YOLKS† do.  Thus for your own sake keep your eggs in the frige. † Was originally misspelled as YOKES until brlittle (below) noticed it.  :-)
I wouldn't believe ANYTHING Krugman has to say.
Gah! Bogus. The article is talking about egg _white_, which has no fat in it. I have experimental proof straight out of the chicken coop in my back yard which dictates that you'd damn well better refrigerate eggs. Mr. Bobcat is welcome to follow his own path, of course. Since it'll smell like rotten eggs, I'm thinking he'll be the only one on it, though.
You know, I'm really torn.  Part of me wants to: A)Make snide comments about the end results of monopolistic communications companies in a "free market" But at the same time, I want to: B)Point and laugh at the stupid SOBs who actually thought they needed an iPhone so badly that they let this happen to them. So I'll call it a wash and declare karma satisfied all around.
Well, I have plenty of time to wait for the next Alpha Centauri game.  After all...I intend to live forever, of course.  Barring that, I think I'd settle for a couple thousand years.  Even five hundred would be pretty nice.
I actually wish he gave her a chance to whine a bit before hanging up.  But I do love that he didn't take her crap.
Some of these questions aren't so basic.....
love this site...kinda
I fail. Back to science class... wait. They're teaching creationism now. Curses!
When the government starts paying for everything, all of our hospitals are going to essentially turn into charity hospitals...
so who was the last 'thinking' president of the US? Nixon? no wonder that road doesn't look that bright either
I made some egg yokes one time. Little leather and wood jobbies, complete with reins and a cart made to scale. I put a GI Joe on the driver's seat of the card (Snake Eyes, if you must know) and told the yoked eggs that if they didn't want him to beat them, they'd better start pulling that cart. They seemed unamused, so I went outside and blew Snake Eyes up with a firecracker. Then I had the eggs for breakfast -- yolks and all.
You should try out Freeciv.  It runs great under XP.
Sorry, I should have been a bit more clear. They're the same damn thing in that they don't really give a flying shit about you or me. It's all about money.
skullars represent the head of the social body, that's the big round thing you see above the shoulders of other people, which they use for thinking primarily, and secondarily for keeping their hats. Granted you are an exception to that general rule. warriars are like the arms of the social body. So you wouldn't go to war without your head, would you? Wait! Scratch that question. No point trying to park a big idea in a space built for a mini-cooper. My bad.
Maybe serious at first.
This guy is awesome. So true.
Sweet! We can play it while we're waiting for Spore
I was going to say that it's more that Eminem is pretty much a carnival barker.
they like run from the truth
If you're the author of the blog I think you may wish to update the links you refer to in the article. Most are dead.
&gt; Under the auspices of preventing piracy the majority of carriers prevent users from transferring anything via bluetooth. The reality is they just want to be able to charge you for each photo/audiofile/whatever that you send. Those bastards... I never thought about that until now. Why don't we have an open source phone yet? Or at least one that isn't run by evil corporations?
nixon resembled the architype. A nerd is always sort of creepy. James Bond, who knows everything about wine and history and science, has to be English. Dr. Who is an english TV hero/ scientist who is also very attractive to beautiful women - who appreciate brains and have them. An old architype of intellegence was Tom Sawyer, who was american and smart. You don't see him much anymore. The last president like that would have been Truman I guess.
G. W. Swagger-Smirk? Are you saying he's not gonna make the cut?
No, almost all Mozilla leaks are the result of live references to GCed memory (in either ref counted or mark/sweep regions, or often across both types of regions) that are held too long.
He most certainly is lol ... didn't even get his own domains for his new company.
Pre Treatment    1.    Do not get laser hair removal  when you have a suntan or sunburn  2.    If you have a darker skin tone, you should begin a bleaching regimen at least two weeks before treatment.  3.    It is not necessary to shave, but it will quicken treatment time.  A shadow or stubble should be visible.  4.    Stop bleaching or plucking for a couple of weeks before treatment.  5.    If you get cold sores or have genital herpes, start taking Zovirax, or similar medicine before treatment    Post Treatment    1.    After the laser hair removal treatment, you may have redness or bumps.  This is normal.  You may use a cold compress if needed.  2.    Makeup may be used.  Moisturizer is good to use.  3.    Use sun block of SPF 25 or more for a couple of weeks after your treatment.  4.    The only other acceptable hair removal method during your treatment regimen is shaving if needed.   5.    Hair will shed up to three weeks after treatment.  It may seem like new hair growth, but it is just the hair coming out.  You can help the hairs out by using a loofah or washcloth.              Related Articles of Laser Hair Removal                                    Copyright©2006 1st-laserhairremoval.com Contact Us | About Us | Disclaimer | Privacy Policy |Link Partner Remember Our Website : 1st-laserhairremoval.com  Laser Hair Removal | Hair Removal | Permanent Hair Removal                         Laser Hair Removal Clinics   Laser Hair Removal in New York Laser Hair Removal in California Laser Hair Removal in Massachusetts Laser Hair Removal in Florida Laser Hair Removal in Maryland Laser Hair Removal in Los Angeles   How much does laser hair removal cost? Here are some ways that laser hair removal clinics decide on the cost of laser hair removal What are the pre/post treatment instructions? Supporting the result of Laser Hair Removal. That's something you should do and dont's 10 Things You Must Know About Getting A Good Laser Hair Removal Service Is Laser Hair Removal Right for You? If you feel that laser hair removal is the right choice for you, it is important to research the facility that will be performing the procedure before you have even one treatment done. Laser Hair Removal - The Facts   A light skin color aids faster and fewer treatments. Darker hair absorbs more of the laser energy and course dark hair will benefit the most. Find out more facts of Laser Hair Removal, here! Knowing About Your Options for Hair Removal  Laser Hair Removal Treatments are a great option for a long lasting hair removal without the worry of having to see unwanted hairs the day after. How about you? Top 3 Most Popular Hair Removal Methods In this way you can decide which method is best for you that fits on your budget, pain tolerance and desired results. Hair Removal Tips For Bodybuilders Here is checklist of body areas and recommended hair removal methods for each. Winning Ways Of Waxing For Hair Removal If you choose to use a waxing hair removal product at home, read all instructions that come with your kit carefully.  Laser hair removal  Permanent laser hair removal tips and secrets.
Hitler will probably still be remembered also, so what's your point?
I no longer wish Paris Hilton would die in a fire. Instead, I've switched to hoping that people who continue to obsess over such talentless, witless, worthless individuals, get to spend eternity in hell surround by them. I don't care what Hilton is "inviting," I'm tired of hearing about her.
As astounded as the author seems, he still doesn't appear to get it.  He considers sociopaths as being "handicapped" by their lack of emotion and empathy.  His mind can't conceive of a life without those frailties, so those *lacking* the disabilities are the freaks. Nevertheless, I'd hope such a realization might disabuse some idealists of the notion that we are all "good" at heart, and that every person can be saved/rehabilitated.  Some view you simply as objects and obstacles, and your nonviolent oaths and secular humanist pseudo-religion is useless against them. BWAHAHAHAHAHA But seriously, it's not all bad. 
&gt; Most people don't even understand what you mean when you say "filesystem". Such access isn't needed. This device isn't a general purpose computer. It's a fucking phone! No way. Jobs and Apple have been hyping this thing as an all-purpose media center. I have yet to see one ad that touts the iPhone's phone capabilities. I think that's a credible gripe if there ever was one.
Thanks for spending $600 to beta-test an immature product so the rest of us wouldn't have to!
Next time post in your native tongue, I'm quite sure that babelfish would do a better job of translating your comment into English than you can...
I'm 50. I knew [Charlie Smith](http://www.c-span.org/antietam/narratives.asp) who was born in Liberia.  He was brought to this country and sold as a slave. My maternal grandfather was born in 1874. History is nowhere near as ancient as some might think.
Because it belongs to the USA! F*** off!
Awesome, thank you for supporting my own laziness :D Man, what a cheap thing for that guy to do ... ohwell.
Not bad, I could see us as either of those as well.
A guy speeds past a patrol car parked at the end of a bridge. He picks him up on radar and pulls him over. The officer comes up to the driver's door and says "Now what do you have to do that would make you go so fast?" The man replies, "Well, I'm a rectum stretcher, I put one finger in there, then another, and i put my hand in there and eventually I stretch it out until its a full six-feet big." "What do you do with a six-foot asshole?" the officer replied. The man says, "YOU GIVE HIM A FUCKIN RADAR GUN AND PUT HIM AT THE END OF A FUCKIN BRIDGE!"
Shades of Vietnam.
&gt;Ann Coulter has balls Why not?  She's already got an Adam's apple.
&gt; Why don't we have an open source phone yet? [We](http://wiki.openmoko.org/wiki/Neo1973) [Do](http://trolltech.com/products/qtopia/greenphone)
Hi Jason, glad to see you're posting here.  I like what you've done with Mahalo it looks nice and clean and airy, and as a new take on the Yahoo! model it looks promising. Just a couple of little reddit things you should know about; being the first to comment on your own post looks spammy to people, the place to pimp your link is the headline. The other is that links to other aggregator sites are slightly pointless; they just don't add much value to reddit.
They are stereotypes.  Scholars are cowards &amp; warriors are fools?  What a crock of shit.  End of story.  It's a lame quote.   I'm surprised the PC Liberal bunch of you are blindly accepting this.  Anyone said this today, and ya'll would be quick to point out how this quote is based on unjust stereotypes
I loved the quotes. They tried to add quotes to Civ 4, but they were nothing compared to the voice acting and quote selection from Alpha Centauri.
I recently resigned from a company doing DOD work ... can I be a reddit headline?
big version i uploaded to imageshack http://img247.imageshack.us/img247/9789/universaliscosmographiakl7.jpg
needing to understand how the white balance works, to set camera to take better/best color photographs.
well said!
I remember reading somewhere - back in the days before blogsphere, mind you - how the Gulf War saved the Pentagon from some serious budget cutbacks.
Marked down for false title. It's a cool picture, but nowhere near the best in 170ish years of photography.
*The majority of his complaints are common with all cell phones.* If the iPhone were marketed or hyped as a cell phone, your comment would be... well, still mostly inaccurate, but at least tolerable. But it's not.  It's marketed as some kind of next-generation computer/communicator/tricorder with all the features you'd expect from Apple.  Thus, the "version 1.0" curse is particularly rankling. And remember: most of the hassles of the typical mobile phone are the result of size and technology constraints.  This is new, different, innovative... and wilfully just as bad. It's poor testing, plain and simple, arising from the effects of Steve Jobs's reality distortion field.  They want it to be the next Macintosh 1.  Instead, it's the next PC/Jr.
...You'd charge him with attempted murder of a mannequin. Sir, GTFO plz.
Grow it!  And send me some :)
&gt; Show me one site with a resizable three-column layout that isn't broken. Define "broken". And so long as you want to rant about how great tables are, remember that they're just as complicated and subject to just about as many cross-browser hacks as CSS layouts -- there's a reason why it took a while for them to catch on, and there's a reason why a lot of folks were eager for an alternative (aside from not wanting their HTML to be cluttered up with superfluous table markup).
I think that it doesn't matter what exactly Bush says, if someone is going to attack the UK or the US they are still going to do it.  Bush isn't exactly bright or strategic, but what he says here isn't that relevant either.
But can it power Vista? [More pictures and better info.](http://people.bath.ac.uk/ccsshb/12cyl/)
If you really want to, it's not too late. Check out Accelerated C++ by Koenig and Moo.
Let's face it, age is not the point. The point is they belong to a religion of love, so they love to kick the fecal matter out of people because that purifies the non believers and makes them more fit for the heavenly afterlife. Oh, one other thing, the moon really is made of sharp green cheddar.
Agreed.  Still (going off topic), I wonder if we would design URL/URI/URNs the same way if we were doing it again today. For example, maybe it would be better to have a peer distributed system based on UUIDs and public key encryption, where anyone can request that a host register its public key as being the owner of a UUID and then other peers would also add that pair into their DBs. After that, whenever anyone asks for the resource associated with that particular UUID, they would only accept as definitive an IP address plus expiration date signed by the private key. That way anyone could put their pages onto the internet permanently without the hassle of dealing with a limited number of domain names that have to be tightly controlled by semi-commercial entities. Of course, the UUIDs would have to be hidden from non-1337 users by a Google-like middle layer that maps site UUIDs to domain name-like keywords (much as Google already hides domain names by mapping them onto searches), but for links, bookmarks, and whatnot UUIDs would provide greater stability than URIs do today.  Of course, that's all just a dream, and even that system wouldn't prevent pathfinder.com from running out of money, but I still wonder if there couldn't be a better way to do URLs. I can't let myself believe we'll still be typing ".com" in 2050, let alone the non-Roman alphabet using peoples of the world.
Photoshop?
&gt;Under the auspices of preventing piracy Sprint and Verizon prevent users from transferring anything via bluetooth. FTFY
Does it make sense? No. But then again: Evolution vs Creationism is religious dogma for both parties, so it doesn't need to.
(and just to clarify about "broken", I want that word defined up-front because different people have different definitions -- some want to do funky things with source order, some want one column fluid and others fixed, some want to do one thing or another with cleared footers or backgrounds, etc. etc.)
No.
&gt; Could you please explain why they are being evil? Apparently they're being evil because they're not refusing the money of those xjvz et al consider to be evil. I suppose they should block searches for racist topics, as well.  Gotta keep all that evil blocked in the Intertubes.   
Whut about the fat check? Someone ought to run those numbers on Mike Moore, who is, am sorry to say, no slouch at living up to his last name.
They also made a version for SNES. Tragically, I formatted my computer when Feisty Fawn came out &amp; lost my massive collection of ROMs, otherwise I'd hook you up with it.
She is indeed one heck of a pi.
Please. If you actually listen to a lot of Paul's positions, he's more than a bit of a fruitcake. But some people want to see him as the second coming because (a) he's consistent -- as if being nutty but _internally consistent_ is some kind of virtue -- and (b) he talks straight. It's only the second part that's giving him any momentum, IMO. People want to hear someone who doesn't mince words or give a damn about polls. Fine. But that doesn't make him electable, and it wouldn't make him a good president.
Foiled!
&gt;Are your Home buttons, both of your two Page Up buttons and both your Up buttons broken? Scroll up and you'll find the link. Hint: Use Ctrl+F and type "investigation" to find it faster. Did that. Didn't find mention of you mentioning any other past investigations. &gt;You still don't get it. What is it specifically that is in error in the 9/11 Commission's findings about how and why the towers fell? What is wrong, for the fourth time, is they didn't base their conclusion on the evidence. How can an investigation that ignores critical evidence be considered legitimate? If I conclude that a murder victim has been asphyxiated after ignoring the gunshot wound to the back of your head there's a bit of a problem, n'est pas? &gt;Is that just an assertion or are you going to explain that further? See above paragraph. &gt;Being warned about attacks and letting them happen are quite different. If someone's warning you that they've going to burn down your neighbours house and you don't inform your neighbor of the police, you're letting the arson happen. &gt;So now those running the conspiracy want the attacks to happen and instead of letting them happen, they plant bombs in WTC1,2&amp;7? Why would that be necessary? Plains hit targets, targets collapse, end of story. The bombs were necessary to guarantee that the targets would collapse. Without collapse of the towers the visual and the death toll would be much less spectacular and less likely to put the public into shock. A public shocked from an attack will accept greater authoritarianism than normal. &gt;The demolition tech was possibly supplied by CDI  &gt;  &gt;&gt;Pure conjecture. Unless you have any proof for it. Hence the use of the word "possibly". &gt;You like to throw these terms around but you've hesitated in actually labeling anything with them. What are the myths you challenge? Why are they myths? The official explanation of 9/11. It is a myth because it's not based on evidence. &gt;That and I'm tired of the popularity contest it creates where you are consistently upmodded by your fellow conspiracy theorists and I am consistently downmodded for not being of your flock. PM would remove the numbers and help focus the conversation. Fair enough. Whatever works.
I read a book about this woman. I don't know how true it is, but it seems a little far-fetched, but think about it, if even two or three percent of this crap is true, it's horrible. We've done terrible things in the past, what makes anyone think that this couldn't happen? Or even still, can't happen? EDIT: Here's the book:   http://www.amazon.com/Trance-Formation-America-Cathy-OBrien/dp/0966016548
Will he please please *please* make it under OpenGL so I don't have to create what will undoubtedly have to be a Vista partition? Oh wait, it's only for consoles I can't afford? Fucker.
No, not rambling, just seems like you have a lot to say.  The only thing I would disagree with you on is birth control. Mainly because covering the Pill is cheaper than covering prenatal care. Generic only, and the least expensive form, of course. I have a bigger problem with my insurance covering someone's Viagra, to be honest. (Particularly since my HMO doesn't consider my BC to be "medically necessary," so I pay out of pocket. But that's a different rant for a different day.) When I say that health care is a human right, and not a product, I don't mean for that to sound like demonizing those who, like you, have reasonable and legitimate concerns about the implementation of such a policy. And I apologize if it sounds that way. It's my opinion that a basic level of care is due even to the people who cannot pay for it, because it's just the decent thing to do.  And in a way, we already have it. Anyone can walk into the emergency room of a county hospital and be taken care of, and not pay. And if they don't pay, it does come out of your taxes, because the county and state reimburse that hospital. (I work in one like that, we do a lot of billing to the state.) So, in addition to concern for people, it also makes good economic sense to formalize that system, and allow these patients to receive basic preventative care and basic (generic) medicines, so they don't get so sick as to need the (more expensive) ER services.  &gt;and I do not want to be paying for people who choose to eat unhealthy, smoke cigarettes, do drugs, etc. etc. Nor do I, but I'd also hate to start giving the government a way to exclude people. Just in case they decide to start excluding everybody. I have a feeling that point is going to be a big deal if we ever get the ball rolling on the issue.  Now, get some sleep! :)
It's pretty obvious to me that you just don't "get" rap or hip hop at all.  If it's so easy to make a hit song by sampling (don't call it a remix, they are completely different things) everyone would have one.  I challenge you to play with a sampler or some DAW software and recreate this song by sampling the Aphex Twin song.  I think you'll find that you can't.  It requires talent and skill that come from years of work and practice. Also, Kanye rarely raps about money, hoes, and rims.  When he talks about his money it is often facetiously or expressing disdain for how he feels wealth has changed him, or shame that he has spent his earnings frivolously.  If you really paid attention, you would know that.  But, you don't because obviously his music isn't good because he does that "black people talking over music" thing.
In other news, the same man decided he was an asshole and voluntarily removed himself from the gene pool. His last words were "Fuck that, too many people pissing in this pool for my comfort." He stepped off an overpass into fast moving traffic and was promptly thrown 40 feet by a Bullet Transport truck.
The answer: if all you can think about is what a boner your 4 year old daughter might give you by accident, see a psychiatrist.
the only one that i couldn't answer was how old is the earth, and that is the only one that is a "basic" question.
HI
Umm.. I call foul on this.  The reason there are only 2-3 dozen famous people is because there just wasn't that much archived.  This person just happened to be one of those historians who archived the major events of the time AND whose writings were not lost.   In 2000 years, we won't have to rely as much on the writings of historians.  We can go back and watch the actual archived footage of the people who made the news and influenced the world.  Not only will we know about what happened in the major world events, but we can google some college kid's blog about how he got ripped off one day. Even this little pithy response will probably remain in some sort of electronic archive (google, archive.com, etc.) till the end of mankind barring some major cataclysmic event  that causes massive loss of internet archives.
You guys are mean, you should know better than to bring up wikipedia around Lou, it upsets him so. Why you should see [all the mean things](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/User_talk:Lou_franklin) they said about him. He gets really upset, and then he needs a hug.  A big manly hug from his fuzzy-wuzzy bear.
I'm not quite sure if you're being honest or sarcastic with that comment (tough to tell online), but I'll assume you're honest. I don't agree with Democrats on much (nor Republicans these days, for that matter), but I'll gladly give Richardson credit for making the right choice here.
The first question is a subtle one.  Most chemistry books don't really give you a good answer for "why".  I could have more easily answered "what happens when salt dissolves in water?".
um, yeah... same thing everyone else has said.  video isn't modified, just not framed in the same way as the photo.   
[citation needed]
Digg sucks so bad. Love the new comment system.
I've no love for Google, but the misdirected outrage here is absurd. Wtf does "Do No Evil" even mean?  I'm sure they're violating someone's definition of "evil" every second of every day. 
This is absolutely silencing her in one aspect. This is a deliberate attempt by an organization who doesn't like what someone says to get other people to go and stop them from saying it. Although she will never be completely silenced, and she can still buy ad space in the papers. Or hell, found her OWN organization to send emails to get her back onto those newspapers. How about "If you don't like reading Ann Coulter in your paper, DON'T READ IT" Seems simple enough. I don't like the golf scores in the sports section, so I don't read it. I don't send the newspaper emails telling them to remove them. And you're right, if they think they'll make more money without her, then by all means, they should do it. It is the free market after all. I'm not one of these guys who says her 1st amendment is being violated, that is what the (un)fairness doctrine wants to do. I'm just saying if someone is saying something also, there is a big difference between a madman on my porch gibbering nonsense and someone writing a column gibbering nonsense. I can throw the paper away, ignore it, even cut the article out if it bothers me sooo much. (Which still amazes me that people are SO weak-willed that they can't just ignore reading something they don't like. It is not only weak-willed but closed-minded), but the madman or hell, let's just say it's Ann Coulter herself, on my porch is encroaching on my property, and I can call the police, threaten him with a weapon, etc. An Ann Coulter column in a newspaper wrapped up on my porch spells no threat to my life, and if it does to you, then you, my friend, have some serious mental problems.
I don't think any of them are basic. Science is a way of understanding the world, not "memorize facts x, y, and z." Moreover, many of their answers are terrible. &gt;Answer:  A daytime sky is blue because molecules in the air scatter blue light from the sun more than they scatter red light. That's a nonsense answer - it just steps back to the definition of color and explains nothing. My shirt is red because it scatters more red photons to my eye than any other color. For a real explanation see [wikipedia's article on the subject](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Diffuse_sky_radiation#Color). I thought the scientist/science writer's answers were pretty bad, honestly. 60 billion years for the age of the earth? Not if the universe is ~14 billion years old. Maybe it's just my personal background in physics, but I thought the approximate age of the universe was pretty common knowledge. They put it on the front cover of *Time* a few years ago, for god's sake.
Point taken. But I've seen both of those phones before. Although they are both open-source and both very cool, they are development prototypes and not end-user mass market phones. I understand that the Neo1973 plans to eventually move out of development, but I'm sceptical.
WHAT A CUNT SOMEONE SHOULD RAPE HER ASS AM I RITE
Hah! Accidental crotch-tickling. I can one-up that. But I won't, because some asshole will track down my IP, find my name, report me to DSS and have my child taken away, the way people do now. :/ Funny story, all the same. I simplified my situation by making Mommy give her baths.
Huh. I guess it finds similarity by tags? Reddit's recommendations isn't worth using IMO.
If Christianity is as violent as you portray it to be, how do you account for a single proponent of Evolution still breathing?
I read it, I didn't see any funny points.
"Just nuke 'em so I can watch my shows."
&gt; "...teens were locked in outdoor dog cages, exercised to exhaustion, deprived of food and sleep, exposed to extreme temperatures without adequate clothing or water, severely beaten, emotionally brutalized, and sexually abused and humiliated. Some were even made to eat their own vomit."   Still not as bad as being a MORMON. 
If you look at the dot com too it looks very much like someone who is NOT Kevin is sitting on that, while the .net is for sale ... isn't this guy supposed to be web-savvy?
one need not look further than mangleon's comment.
I'll have to check and see if the Wizard of Oz can be downloaded from iTunes yet.
The one that blew my mind was the lady whose lived in the same mud hut behind a hotel for 100+ years. Seeing pictures like this makes me wonder what the world will be like if I happen to live for so long.
It is disputable, and I dispute it. In 2003 I attended a Royal Society-sponsored lecture given by the head engineer of the WTC towers. His detailed explanation of the mode of collapse is entirely consisten with the visual evidence. There are no mysteries about it. I know this is hard to accept, but sometimes, things happen just the way they appear to have happened.
Haven't you heard? It's a battle of words?
This review says that with the Transformers, what you see is what you get
well, seemingly disparate, but they all share a marginalised social status. By that standard, the places to watch for the 'next big thing' are not the record studios.
Yeah, I would have guessed the second one from the right.  Based solely on appearance, as shallow as that is, she seemed the one to fit the needy, looking for attention type to me much more so than the "hottest" one.  Though, "hot" is certainly a relative term here.  They are, after all, still British, and let's face it, producing beautiful women is certainly not at the top of the UK's list of contributions to the world.
Tidbit: the [Babylonian method](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Methods_of_computing_square_roots#Babylonian_method) for finding the square root of N uses the function f(x) = (x + N/x)/2 and iterates it in the same way as in this article.  For N=2, this appears to converge a little faster than the function that mjd uses.  (Note that sqrt(N) is a fixed point of f.) More generally, if you have a differentiable function g such that g(r) = 0 but g'(r) != 0, the function f(x) = x - g(x)/g'(x) has a fixed point at r (this is Newton's method).  If g is "reasonably well-behaved" (I'll leave that definition to you :] ), you can use mjd's method on this function f. EDIT: It might not be necessary that g'(r) != 0.  The conditions for the convergence of Newton's method are complicated, though: take a look at [http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Newton's_method#Counter_examples ](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Newton's_method#Counter_examples) for a better explanation.
We're only human.  Well, I'm not.  I'm a machine sent back from the future to buy Halliburton stock.
_Mea culpa_. But I maintain that this is hardly a substitute for parental advice or consultation with a physician. The school nurse can't even give you a fucking aspirin these days. In spite of the fact that half the time, when you go to the doctor, they send in the nurse (practitioner). :/
this is unbelievably ignorant! They forgot all the other gays! In and not limited to these fields: in entertainment, in fashion, in the arts, in cuisine, in construction, in plumbing, in bakery, in the church itself, in politics, in gardening, in medicine, you name it! Stupid protesters only targeting computers!!
which is nowhere near as bad as being a BIGOTED MORON.
They were pulled hands behind their backs, run upon the ground and put up to the cash register. Oh, Please!
Use it for good? Or buy your big brother's seat in the Senate. I guess you could stretch the latter as the former.
One thing I can say, is that it is NOT the North Pole, nor is there any such place as "Antartica". I guess those who say "nucular" would tend towards the incorrect spelling and pronunciation.
_The average British woman sleeps with 6.9 lovers during her lifetime, according to a new survey._ HAHAHA... man those survey takers are gullible. 6.9 that they admit to maybe...
just her ass
They weren't lost because they were EXPLICITLY saved. The Peloponnesian War was a major episode in Western history, and his book about it is the one major thoroughly researched and objectively (for the standards of the day) written recording of that war. As such, it was copied much thereby saving it for posterity, and his influence on the development of modern methods of writing history has been tremendous. Please take a few classics and history courses before you dis Thucydides! Respect his authoritay!
The judge did not comment on her maturity re: _having_ an abortion. He commented on her fitness to _decide whether one was warranted_. Not the same thing.
...Maybe you could extrapolate on that for someone who is wanting to become a music major?
This actually reminds me of an old neighbor of mine. He passed away a few years ago at the age of 103. He used to joke about robbing the cradle, because his wife was "only" 92.
that's the devil's dirt boy. rub it in... it's good for ye.
I missed where it offers any evidence that this was because of his views on creationism. This is obviously a very strong possibility, but how does he (and we) know this is the case?
WHO CARES?
he's in you're sentences messing up you're grammarz...
Heh heh heh - he got a funny name!
Openmoko isn't that far off based on the wiki and the mailing list. They are looking at a mass-market release in October. Whether you believe the software will be ready by then or not is for you to decide yourself, but I'll be keeping my fingers crossed.
These are things everyone should have been taught in school. I think that's what the article is getting at -- these are things that people, even non-scientists, should know; if they can't remember these, what can they remember?
Japanese resistance to Unicode is just baffling. Sure, it's not perfect. Yeah, it might have been better if characters were composed out of a bank of radicals instead of logically independent. However, Unicode is superset of Shift-JIS, the code that Japanese people have been using for years. So, it's not a step backwards, it's just not the step forwarded they wanted. How can they bitch about it just because it didn't deliver that much more than everyone else? As far as I'm concerned being able to encode almost every language ever is a pretty decent accomplishment by the Unicode team. Don't get mad because you can't also encode things you just made up too.
I wonder if they're factoring in the fact that they and others are using these systems.  I wonder what effect it would have on the output to factor in a competing system being used to subvert another?
Also don't forget that he killed himself because he was ridiculed and humiliated for being gay.  
Yeah, exactly what I was thinking. Does anyone know what will be new in Revolutions, relative to Civ 4 and previous games in the franchise?
Linux caches files as they are loaded.  All major operating systems do this.  When Vista boots, is immediately finds files that were accessed recently and loads them into RAM.  It doesn't wait for you to run the program to load the program into RAM.  It loads it immediately upon bootup, along with all of the other programs that you normally use. A similar functionality for Linux would be something like this in /etc/rc.d/S99fillcache:  find / -atime 7 -exec cp {} /dev/null\;
&gt;Right now it is you that comes off as intolerant one. Absolutely. I am very intolerant towards fundies and racists. I am not a hypocrite.
Yeah. The "you have installed cPanel correctly" screen. So?
I don't see cowards or fools used or implied in anything I wrote. How come this inane response from you is attached a sa reply to me?
Why should they remember them? The only question of any practical value is the one about the light bulb. Beyond that these are completely useless. Okay, maybe the salt one, too. Second Law of Thermodynamics is more interesting when the entropy model is applied to other systems, like currencies and politics.
too hard to find stories, they take up way too much room on the page.
If by "bigot" you mean "one obstinately and blindly devoted to his own church, party, belief, or opinion," then I suppose Mitt might be considered as such.  However, I take exception to your labeling him a "moron."  As deluded as he may be in devoting his life to an extraplanar faerie, he does seem to possess some modicum of adult intelligence. 
Nope! LOL!
I may have missed it, but was there ever really a DIRECT connection made between his criticism and the beating he took?  Most of what I saw in that article was highly speculative, and had a bit of a conspiracy-theory air, in my opinion. Besides, there's a heck of a lot worth discussing about his treatment in the University after he took a stand for what he thought, no need to (possibly?) invent connections that may or may not exist...
I was all set to go "Meh!" Then I noticed the "Kilroy Was Here" bear's head tucked in the crook of Adolf's arm. I can't stop snickering now.
&gt;There are raving loons in every organazation. Apologists. The fact is that your right wing religious fundamentalism is based on hate. It is bound to lead to extremism.
Don't forget the Police Man, Cowboy, Leather Biker or Indian Chief.
I too thought it would be Paris. Here's a fake interview of her at least: http://reddit.com/goto?id=22kzo
God bless you George for protecting the right to life.
Do you ever see people who are pure academics crawling out of their ivory towers to go DO anything truly good and courageous nowadays? Examine the movement which wields the sword of American military might today, the neo-conservative movement. Its members are largely academics, trained in the Straussian school of thought, itself an extension and perversion of Platonic thought. None of them were warriors, yet they are foolish enough to think they are worthy and wise enough to understand how to "transform" the middle-east. Thucydides was Athenian, he lived in the hotbed of Greek academics and thought; he was very familiar with the sophists and academics of his day, he saw what they were capable of. He experienced the disaster which was the Peloponnesian War - heed his advice.
We really should just pluck out everyone's eyes.  Nobody has a right to see anyone else doing anything.
Even those of us are who supporters agree.   I can't figure out why anyone would want to read this article.   Ron Paul is great, but that doesn't mean we need an article everytime someone thinks he might sneeze.
Yo, Digg is that way ---&gt;
easy
Hahaha... This is one of the greatest things I've ever heard.
Glad I'm not the only one who came to that conclusion. There are only two in there who look like they could conveniently rack up 180 hits in 10 years or so, and she's one of them. Sure, it's a shallow analysis, but I'm just sayin'...
Because a lot of people don't live near an apple store. Duh.
Likewise. The reason I don't use apple products is because they are so damned proprietary. The whole mobile phone industry is ridiculously closed and consumers are shafted because of it. But the phone makers aren't the real culprits IMHO. The carriers are really to blame for the sad state of affairs in the mobile market. Will the carriers even allow us to use this phone?
Does the 8-track player still work?  ;-)
He *is* a Freedom Fighter - for he fights Freedom in all its forms.
This page is extremely amateurish, poorly-designed, and probably not worth the time it would take you to learn to hate it. (It's the pop-up caution boxes, for one thing. Avoid.)
I believe he's talking about the dangers of conjecture and theory divorced from facts and reality, and of action devoid of judgment. As tempting as it is to view the quotes of ancient Greek historians through the prism of American high school movies, I don't think Thucydides is making a statement about "jocks" vs. "geeks". The Greeks had no such dichotomy.
It's mostly automated. My buddy and I do spend a lot of time finding new sources rather than individual videos, however, if we like something, we add it to our channels.
No problem...  it is still strange that my load time for both got down to 0.4 -0.6 sec But the average is much higher. While in fact the load time of php script shouldn't be so much different.  It's not enough detailed. We all know that the load time may vary from day to night. So it could be interesting to see. Average time per hour. by number of hit. Because if the load time is 2,5 sec while there is 1 hit per hour it is worse than a load time of 2.5 sec while there is 5000 hit per hour. And i personnaly would restart the test to make sure the conditions are the same. Keep the old values but restart with good ones.  
oh, yeh. See... I was talking about you.
It comes across as racist and dismissive of other factors, which isn't surprising.  The publication, Middle East Quarterly, is produced by [Daniel Pipes](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Daniel_Pipes)' organization, the Middle East Forum.
So you do Django professionally? Cool.
You don't need an open source phone to do all of this, you just need to fly across any of the two oceans.  It's an unfortunate that North American carriers are so greedy and it is the main reason why we lack behind Asia and Europe when it comes to wireless technology.
I wonder how skewed the numbers would be for men?
1. At the time they ordered the coffins, they hadn't yet backtracked from "flying saucer" to "weather balloon". The major on the scene had announced the flying saucer; he wouldn't have worried too much about letting everyone know by contacting the local undertaker. 2. The concern wouldn't have been with giving them a burial; rather preserving the bodies. The request, if you read his testimony, was for *airtight* coffins.   
Touched a nerve I see
No, I'm pretty sure that is supposed to be Indo-china, not India (which means it's even more distorted).  Notice the straights of Bosporus at the bottom.  India is actually smaller on the map than it should be in relation to the rest (and much thinner).  Even stranger are the large islands to the east of India. Europe and Africa seemed impressively accurate though.
The real story is that most of the front-running candidates for president at the moment (Romney: his Utah bagman Lichfield; Giuliani: [his coke-dealing SC bagman](http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/19317367/) and [Bernie Kerik](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bernard_Kerik#Investigation_results) for starters; Clinton: ...Jesus Christ, that's a long row to hoe, but I'm sure you're familiar with the name 'Whitewater' to begin with; Obama: [Tony Rezko](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Antoin_Rezko)) should more accurately be considered suspects in [RICO](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Racketeer_Influenced_and_Corrupt_Organizations_Act) investigations rather than leading candidates for a presidential election. But such is the nature of 21st century American federal politics. **edit:** -J- made a good point.
A white supremacist mime sounds like someone you'd hear on Howard Stern's radio show. Then again, you wouldn't really hear much of him.
&gt; Matz used (and still uses AFAIK) Unix only. If it's part of unix (eg fork()) it's in Ruby. If it's not (eg proper threading) it's not in Ruby. Similarly, Matz is used to old-style C with global static vars all over the place, and therefore that's how Ruby is always gonna be. Having been an IT manager in Japan on occasion, I'd say it's a cultural thing that there's no point fighting. Sure, Ruby 2 is right around the corner. Sure. Japanese culture esteems global variables...?  That's a weird one; is it true?
Yeah, they had spears in 1507.  Shoot, I think they might have even had guns and stuff.
It sounds like the military, without the volunteering bit... I knew a guy whose brother was forced to eat his own vomit after being forced to drink so much water, he couldn't take it anymore. Nothing to do with Romney, but an interesting tidbit. Try to digest.
&gt; oh, yeh. See... I was talking about you. Oh, really?  My God!  I had no idea! In that case, you're so totally off the mark!!  I'm so totally NOT a bigot, some of my best friends are queer Negro spirituals and crippled oriental Shiit muslins, and my IQ is almost a whole three numbers. ... 
another spectacular Formula 1 crash video (GP2 is junior F1). This time from 2007 Magny Cours GP2 Ernesto Viso crashes into air... trying to be like Robert Kubica :)
Get this shit away from me.
mmm, it's psychohistorific!
They *do* have HowardTV now, you know. ;)
her?
Actually, the globe or any representation thereof is a trademark of the Disney Corporation.  Sorry.
Who the fuck needs a 600 dollar phone.  God damn this is the fucking poster child for what is wrong with America right now.
`volatile` can't possibly tell the compiler anything about threads.  Threads simply are not covered in the C or C++ standards, and therefore the effect of volatile (or any language feature) in the presence of threads is implementation defined (at best).
He [downsized more than a few workers](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2007/05/30/these-ads-kept-mitt-romne_n_49954.html). He's basically a terrorist.
oh, hi George.   Are you going to show up in Congress next week?
I've seen those around me doing it ... where was Personal Finances 101 when I was in high school?
&gt;“I think that they didn’t use the cameras like how they should. They should only be used for safety I think,” student, Jade Egelhoff said. They should fucking sell the damn things and use the money to teach you some speech skills.
I thought that button was going to cry for a second. There's nothing more pathetic than a begging button.
There's a good read on the front page - [Richard Feynman and The Connection Machine](http://www.longnow.org/views/essays/articles/ArtFeynman.php?dupe=with_honor) - that talks about the conception of this technology way back in the 1970s.
Being CPU-bound isn't the only reason you want a thread-safe and/or reentrant interpreter.  Having multiple isolated interpreter contexts in the same process has a lot of advantages, like being able to work properly with Apache's thread worker model.  The interpreter implementation basically boils down to passing a context structure around instead of using globals, along with a few other niceties.  This is how the Spidermonkey and Lua interpreters both work, so it's not like this is uncharted territory.
It'd be really fascinating to compare a color version of this to this black and white version. I have a feeling that the color version would leave us shocked and scared, by what potentially awaits us, which the black and white version is actually somehow uplifting and noble.
If I had to read those cryptic faces to properly function in a relationship, I'd give up and invest in a shovel and some quicklime. 
Downvoted for implying that Photoshop should be used for text layout.
What did ROMNEY do?  Not a friend, not an acquaintance, not a business associate, what did Romney do.
Although there is no AIM, there is a web app that'll take care of that, apparently. http://www.publictivity.com/iPhoneChat/ I don't have one, as I'm waiting for the second, all bugs worked out model. Regardless, it's a marvelous device, from what I've seen, and am eager to get one.
Is emacs a good UI? Same question goes to the original poster about his proprietary IDE thats now catered towards the mass developer. I agree with your point about traditional animation and motion capture suits though. The comparison reminds me of those old Sierra games that made such great use of the hardware at the time, to the in recent years at least poor quality game titles released one after the other. 
Did they time-warp it?  He sounds like Mc Chris...
Great article. I had no idea Romney came within spitting distance of taking down Ted Kennedy. Those were really powerful ads as well. If the dog torture, Mormonism/magic underwear, flip-flopping, teenager abuse, and general problem of looking like guy smiley doesn't do him in... this will. I wonder if Kennedy would allow these ads to be used again by the democratic candidate? Who owns the rights to things like this? Bob Shrum maybe?
Parts of the Ruby interpreter are well over a decade old and some of the design decisions clearly reflect that.
&gt; Feynman's router equations were in terms of variables representing continuous quantities such as "the average number of 1 bits in a message address." I was much more accustomed to seeing analysis in terms of inductive proof and case analysis than taking the derivative of "the number of 1's" with respect to time.  Sounds like Feynman was using something akin to [queueing theory](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Queueing_theory), which is a perfect tool for sizing buffers.
Maintaining a system that profits from misery and pain is not evil? Nice set of ethics there.
...not before Fudd blew his bill off with a shotgun.
I guess that information was an inconvenient truth for Gore.  LOL!
AT&amp;T in the past has been relatively decent about bluetooth though, so it seems quite likely that the limits are set by Apple (and it could just be that they aren't done with the wireless contact sync or whatev)  For example, many phones sold support tethering and AT&amp;T/Cingular have in the past done this quite well. Also A2DP support is on almost all modern media phones there is no reason except for lack of time or ability to implement it for it not to be on the iPhone.  AT&amp;T/Cingular are cruel in many ways but they arent verizon,  and have been nowhere as anti consumer about the handsets (about the contracts is a different story). I strongly doubt  that much if any is because AT&amp;T told Apple no, it is probably just stuff that wasn't good enough to go out in the first firmware release.
My semi-dickheaded responses to his complaints: 1. If you want a laptop, buy a laptop.  2. Learn how to use the iPhone, and wait for Rev b or c.  3. If you want a Blackberry, buy a Blackberry.  4. Wait for Rev b or c  5. I'd like to see YOU design a better UI  6. The iPhone is beautiful. Don't argue the need to mar the aesthetics for your special needs ears.  7. Wait for Rev b or c  8. Dude, you're a guy. You're supposed to *always* know where you are.  9. Welcome to American cell phone companies.  10. You could always use a Windows Mobile phone. LOL.
The system operators could include an opposing force (OPFOR) as part of the simulation if they wanted to. In fact, using the SimBridge thing, they could introduce it into an existing, stable system without having to reprogram the main sim from scratch. See: http://www.simulexinc.com/products/technology/#simbridge   
How about a NSFW tag???  My boss caught me wanking off to those and I almost got fired!!! 
Bullshit.  You're a whore, and got your feathers ruffled at the reminder.  Just try to put the 30 or so drunken mistakes you've made out of your mind.  You can't unfuck them.
I prefer to manually unroll the loop to ensure all eight of my BCUs (beer chugging units) are kept busy.
I don't get it.
Who is defending the current state of the US health care system?   We are rejecting it.   You have pointed out a large part of what we reject in the first two paragraphs, and then somehow try to link that into a reason to go to socialized health care.  The problem is in the government forcing the problems you listed (and more...), more government is not the answer.  Government is the problem.
Surge= Vault 
&gt;Any organism's shape and appearance is a matter of happenstance: what works best in their current environment, and what evolutionary heritage they have to build on. The problem I always have with that theory (and I firmly believe in evolution) is things like birds.  Clearly the first instance of a bird-like creature wasn't capable of flight.  Flight had to have evolved as an advantage.  But how then did the first bird-like creature actually take to the air when their previous non-flight-producing physiology wasn't advantageous?  Or insects that cocoon?  How exactly did that behavior evolve?  What advantage is there to hiding yourself for a week while you transform into an entirely different creature, one that flies while your pupal state didn't? I often wonder if perhaps radiation levels were much greater in, say, the time of the Cambrian Explosion, thus leading to greater mutation rates and perhaps accelerated evolution.  Although core samples and such could probably disprove that rather quickly. Maybe it's just difficult to grasp that these things happened over *millions* of years, allowing time for some exotic behavior to be evolved.
Doe, a deer, a female deer.
If google were to actively solicit white power groups for ads on pages about civil rights would that be evil or not evil by your lights?  And yes, big pharma and big health insurance are in the same moral category, at least as long as their business model is predicated on maintaining a cruel and __ineffective__ system to give themselves economic rents.
In soviet russia, TV watches you.
New York the city, yes. New York the state, well...we sure could use a program like this here. I say that both as a resident of a state hemorrhaging talented young college graduates *and* a talented young SUNY graduate (and resident of New York state) $30k in the hole.
So what, is conyers able to change the past?  Does he have evidence there are current experiments?
So we have to wait for people to actually kill now before we can arrest them for intent to commit murder because otherwise it would be a thought crime.  Don't be an idiot.
I'm either too dumb to understand this or this is the most hilarious bit of paranoid techno-rambling I've seen on reddit in quite a while. The author lost me around the allusions to The Matrix.
Wrong?  So you're saying you _can_ unfuck them?  Well I guess you can in the sense that you can lie about the number when people like survey takers ask you.
Well except for the no GPS issue, which is just annoying (even more so in that it can't even use a blue tooth gps to get a starting point for google maps)   Oh and i suppose the lock-in issue (which is of course much less of a big deal if they do update the software) But yes, if Apple just drops their first buyers and releases a better model there will be riots.
Apparently it's either an "idiotic attempt" if it fails or an "inside job" if it succeeds.
I am redoing the test and plan on starting it again in a few days. I wasn't returning much html back to the iframes and i want to see if that makes a difference. I plan on archiving the results from the first test on a page and then running the new test.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=umd-LnuhXDk Edit: Oh snap, this one is a snubapoloosa! Check it, homies. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iKZw7lCIp4M   
Just a note: not all crisis pregnancy centres are prolifer propaganda tools. I support on in my city that offers all sorts of useful programs (free clothing and other social support, counselling, classes, free pregnancy tests, etc...). It is a Christian organisation. However, they do not push (or even mention) Christianity to their clients unless asked, and all of their materials would be appropriate in any government/private place.  They do not make referrals for abortion (partly because in their experience women who have had abortions are usually way more messed up emotionally than ones who did adoption, but mostly because they try to avoid medical referrals altogether). However, when telling women what their options are, they do inform them that abortion is one of their options. They also do explain abortion to their clients, but not in such a way to scare them off or guilt them. For example, one of their policies is to *never* show women pictures of aborted fetuses. I've also heard all of the staff there that I know go off on at least one tirade about the various extreme prolifers in my city.
There's an unfortunate shadow on from his nose that resembles Hitler's mustache. I agree with Ron Paul, but he needs better lighting on his face.
Thanks for the information, and like I said, I don't study any of this in an academic sense, but I'm extremely interested in it.   I'll look into your suggestions :) The problem I find with most of this stuff, is that a lot of it is beyond my ability to comprehend. It's hard to find sources that relate this to something which the average person can understand. That's the only reason I suggested What the Bleep. It kind of shows you the way in which they're attempting think "outside the box" but in a way in which the masses can understand. Maybe that's the reason there is no "superstar expositor"?
Because going into debt to attend a *public college* is absurd when we didn't have to go into debt to attend *public high school* in the first place?
To the folks complaining about the Ayrabs not fighting fair: lay down your high-tech equipment, vehicles and weaponry, and show us what this fighting fair thing is all about. Fair is whatever minimizes our casualties and culpability, and portrays us in the best possible light.
at least they were over 5000, eh? ;-)
I've watched the show and most of the people are so obviously guilty it's not even funny.  I've never seen them actually go after people that didn't show up so this must be a new things they are doing to up the stakes.  Not sure I agree with it.
(BTW, backticks create monospaced text.) An example I remember about `volatile` is that of a memory-mapped register variable that may change even though no assignment to it appears in the code.  e.g.  x = 1;   while (x); is normally an infinite loop, but if `x` is a memory-mapped register, it can change over the course of the loop.  Another case is as in Duff's device, when writing to the same variable performs output: e.g.  *port = 'H'; *port = 'i'; *port = '\n'; where each assignment has an effect, even though normally the first two would be redundant. So the `volatile` keyword seems like the closest that C and C++ come to acknowledging multi-threading.  Although threads are not mentioned by name, marking an object as volatile indicates that it may be accessed in some way that the compiler cannot anticipate... this sounds like multi-threading to me. I think I read http://www.ddj.com/dept/cpp/184403766 a while back; I'd be interested to know whether you take issue with anything in there.
I'm thinkin' about showin' up so I can give Harry Reid a wet willie.
Poker? Bullshit.
Or, all timelines exist in all universes, and everything that could happen has happened and will happen. With a brief nod to John Titor :)
Maybe they're just behind the times.  Groovy used to seem like a pretty good idea.  Plus, people have a strange aversion to Javascript.
Terrsts.
the question about the salt has practical value?
&gt;6. The iPhone is beautiful. Don't argue the need to mar the aesthetics for your special needs ears. Yeah, shell out $600 for something that values form over function. Classic Apple.
Anything can be done.  There are some engineering challenges to make these mods work, but they are solveable.   You will find the hard part isn't modifying the car, but bribing the right politicians to make roads big enough for you car after you mod it.   Don't forget to check emissions, your bribes might have to cover new emissions laws as well.  (In fact you should reseve a few hundred millions for "other bribes" just in case I forgot something) Of course if this was a good idea I would charge money for telling you it.
With the photo thing, my solution was to buy a cheap micro-sd card and then use a card-reader.  Bastards can't catch me now.  On that, the iPhone doesn't do MMS but you can e-mail 2125551212@attwireless.com with the image attachment and NOT get charged 25 cents for an MMS.
I didn't mean the design decisions of the Ruby implementation; I meant the part about Japanese culture.  Saying that a national culture favors certain forms of program code sounds a bit strange to me.
He used an allusion?
Why? To pay the private tax that is interest? Fuck that. Public college should be free, or damn close to it.
I'm told by some open source friends on the mozilla IRC network that they have no choice but to allow it as you can just stick your SIM card in, however I think differently.  Cingular won't activate an unlocked phone I'm told (by a friend who tried to activate an unlocked version of a phone they sell), and this is no different.
Something i view as self-evident but i never see brought up is that human beings in its current form will never achieve space settlement. Its very sci-fi but realistically we need to transfer our conciousness to machines to be able to. Is it possible? I think so, after all its not like our brains are composed of magic. They can be reconstructed but the technology to do so effectively is very far off.
My initial answers, skipping past the celebrity answers: 1. Water and salt satisfy some of kind of molecular imbalance in each other.  No idea what the imbalance is. 2. 7 billion years old. 3. Electrons flow like a wave in, exciting the electron state of some atoms, that become unstable and fall to a lower state which releases a photon, creating light. 4. Do you mean identical twins, or what?  Identical, as far as I know, yes. 5. Something in the atmosphere, uhhh..  how do certain elements affect certain frequencies of light more than others? 6. The uhhh.. entropy one.. systems tend towards chaos.. etc (total guess, who even established which rule was which?)
I hope it's nothing to do with Ayn Rand...
And for the libertarian whine-mongers populating this article's comment thread, it gives them something else to bitch about. Everybody wins!
It really puts both their age and our history into perspective when you hear that someone living now had a father who stood beside Lincoln.
Totally agree, and how about the fact that USA spends more than the next 10 countries combined on military, and USA can barely control Iraq. Pretty sad.
&gt; Sorry, we can't seem to find the page you wanted... &gt; We may have messed up, or you may have entered a bad URL...  
Why is it that there never seems to be an end to Feynman stories?  Just when I think I've read them all... It seems like everything he ever did makes an incredibly interesting story.
That's pretty amazing!
And don't forget that [Photography is Banned in Downtown Silver Spring, Maryland](http://reddit.com/info/20jbg/comments)
"Those who make wise decisions are more formidable to their enemies than those who rush madly into strong action."  I think I may like this one just as much :-) Sound familiar to anyone else?
[This article on Unicode and Japan][1] (written by the same guy who wrote the linked comment), explains why some Japanese developers have been so resistant to Unicode.  [1]: http://www.jbrowse.com/text/unij.html
Yes.
Thee are some stories I find on this site I wish I could vote up multiple times. This is one of them.
Ahh yes, time to break out the "I'll have you know..." horseshit.  The final confirmation of whoredom.  So is your husband aware of your extramarital escapades?  Or is he just such a pathetic little dumbass that he puts up with it? Well I guess he'd have to be considering your ample girth.
I think sociopathy is more of a tendency than an absolute. And I think it's pretty common. I've got sociopathic tendencies, but I was raised to be a good guy and am easy to get along with for the most part. My girlfriend's kind of the same way. Society would benefit tremendously by understanding the sociopathic mindset. Ignorance of the mindset makes people easy prey. Normal people tend to think in terms of human relations (from the perspective of their tribe/family/peer group) whereas those with sociopath tendencies, I think, have a more detached, system-based analysis of reality. I'd guess that tribal beliefs such as religion are less common in sociopaths and they are seen as tools by sociopaths as tools for control. There's a good book about psychopaths and sociopaths called "People of the Lie" ( http://www.amazon.com/People-Lie-M-Scott-Peck/dp/0684848597 ), focussed on how human predators carefully cultivate the appearance of normality to increase their effectiveness. There's an amusing TV series as well called "Dexter" about a forensics blood analyst who moonlights as a vigilante serial killer. 
Wait, hold up....
She's really funny..
The problem isn't just that these pictures are kind of crappy; it's that they don't look anything like the real South Park characters do. And how I know that is, South Park [already showed you](http://www.southparkstudios.com/media/wallpaper/913_Composite_Sketch_1280x1024.jpg) what these characters look like "realistically". 
Think about how many of our actions are recorded in various databases. The federal government [is buying](http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2006/06/14/AR2006061402063_pf.html) this information from the corporations that gather it, then analyzing it for trends, a process known as data mining.
best.mashup.ever.
&gt; If google were to actively solicit white power groups for ads on pages about civil rights would that be evil or not evil by your lights? It would be a stupid business move, but not evil. &gt; And yes, big pharma and big health insurance are in the same moral category [as racists] OK. My understanding of Google's definition of "evil" is simply that they are not to abuse the trust you place in them when using their services. It's naïve to assume they will never do anything anyone considers "evil," let alone believe they have a duty to  solve all the world's ills. 
I honestly have a hard time believing people's sarcasm detectors can actually be *that* poor, but it seems to be the case.
Aww, I know the feeling. Sorry that I misunderstood, but at least I didn't mod you down. :)
and in the movie before that
Indiym.com - India's growing internet portal for  entertainment, career, article, review, friends, jokes, recipe, mobile, ecommerce, shopping, sms  sports...
&gt;Q: Roughly how old is the earth? They all got this one wrong WAY wrong. Its really about 6,400 years old. DUH! http://www.creationmuseum.org/   
why, those little bastards!
lool, i love the picture of bill gates and the mouse on the terminology entry
My grandpa is in his late 90s and is slowly dying of cancer.  He has worked hard all of his life, and up until a couple of years ago was at least as strong as me.  It seems like hard physical work makes people live longer.
So quick to protest, so much fragility to the ego.  Why would you care what I think if I'm so stupid?
But it just doesn't stop. I can be careful around cars, only cross with the light, etc., but when there are three car bombs found, two through chance, and one that should have gone off but didn't, you revert back to the IRA days...you say 'Well, I guess I could die...best not worry about it'.  Fatalism isn't as much fun as it sounds. I think the ideal way lies between the two poles...between 'The terrosists are going to kill your children' and 'Terrorism?  What terrorism?'.  It makes sense to take some precautions, and also to find out who these people are and why they're sending flaming Jeeps into Glasgow Airport.  And it makes sense to look a bit harder at the cars you pass.   Also, as an OAP said after the IRA bomb in Manchester, 'We've been bombed by a better class of bastards than THIS!'
All the money spent on neat toys and training would have been better spent as bribes.
Heavy on the buzz words.  In fact, it reminds me of Rails.   So why not just use Rails?  Will this combo of Groovy + PHP be easier to use than Ruby?  Will Project Zero be better than Rails for creating RESTful applications and services? It sounds like IBM trying to make their investments in Java and PHP seem more relevant.   
It could be interface busy-ness on SD displays. Civ III onward demanded decent resolution to really work.
Was? Still is, maaaaaaan! ;)
Oooh, I'm so hurt!  The fat chick who trolls the comic book store called me an idiot!  The shame!  The ignominy!
&gt; Yo, Digg is that way ---&gt; &gt; permalink parent report reply On the reply link? Oh noes!
I suddenly want your grocery store chain to build a store in New York.
♪ [You down with entropy? *Yeah, you know me!*](http://www.music-lyrics-chord.com/MC_Hawking/299760-Entropy.html) ♫
Woah.  Stumbling upon this while in the middle of Cryptonomicon is just weird.  It's like seeing a sign talking about my friend, only wait he's just from a book, only wait no he's NOT he was a real person, etc. etc.
I'd summarize that article as "tragically incomplete to the point of misleading". His first example is still wrong on many platforms despite the addition of volatile to `flag_`.  To ensure a thread executing on another CPU sees `flag_` change, you may need memory barriers around all accesses of `flag_`. Yes, _maybe_ using volatile will change the behaviour of a threaded program (and maybe even change it in your favour), but you can't rely on it, and it's _not enough_ in most cases anyway.  The respective standards committees need to get real and specify this stuff properly.  Looking at what Java has done would be a good start. (Note that a `volatile` field in Java 5.0 includes memory barriers in the appropriate places on the appropriate platforms.)
Errr...  I was implying the picture itself was Photoshopped.  Judging by the score of the comment, I should've made it clearer.
Sure, that is true. But I just don't think our government is competent enough to do anything with it.
If you hate here, why don't you go over there?
can you?
You need threads for that. Or straws. ☺
there was an article a while back (two years?)in scientific american that put forth the theory that wings evolved to help bird's ancestors run up trees to escape predators. by tilting the proto-wings in the right way they could reamin closer to the trunk for longer as they ran up the tree. from there the proto-wings evolved to help out with gliding, and eventually flying. I'll see if i can find that article somewhere.... i thin one of the things to keep in mind with eveloution is that just because we might not have been clever enough to come up with the theory to how a particular feature arose, doesn't mean that there is (probably multiple) paths it could have taken.
Amateur. If he had simply kept her on the line while he rattled off his "shove your crappy book, bitch" rant so he could get her response, it would have been 10x better.
If that's enough reason to get you in the room...
10^80 is 1 followed by 80 zeros. We know pi to billions of decimal places and people can recite 1000+ places from memory. The AES256 encryption system we use is 2^256 or close to 10^78. And nowadays the 2^1024 AES that's being used in more secure environment is over 10^300 bits. We indeed deal with numbers far larger than the known number of atoms in the universe. So yeah, relatively speaking, it's really not that many.
&gt; A counselor determined that he was high on marijuana because his eyes were red ... [As a result] he was barraged with hours of humiliating questions, strip-searched, and held against his will for months until he managed to escape. So basically they operate just like any other juvenile "treatment" center in the US.  Sometimes I think the counselors at "troubled teen" treatment centers have more problems than the teenagers do.
Depends on how far you want to drill into what "why" means, but I doubt anyone would read this question as asking for an explanation of why opposite charges attract, for example.  You have to stop somewhere or you could go on forever :) Water's polar, its molecules very negatively charged and positively charged ends ionize the salt, and you get sodium and chlorine ions in the water instead of a in a crystal structure with each other because they remain attracted to the polar water molecules.  That's "why" enough for this question.
If the people in these photos had lived one after the other, the first one would have been born the year Constantine the Great became Roman emperor.
Michael Savage (from The Savage Nation) is scary. He openly advocates closing down mosques in the interest of national security. If that's not racist then I don't know what is.
I love photographing old people (in color), and I find their faces uplifting.  A wrinkled face is a beautiful thing.
This is all very bleak, but I think you are correct in your assumptions.  One thing I believe you have to factor in is the use of clairvoyance and telepathy and remote viewing, which the CIA and military have been investigating, if not actively using, for many years.  If I sound paranoid, well, I am.
Good to hear -- now I won't have nightmares.
also; the president has found that democrats can't talk around a mouth stuffed with pork.
No shit it happened in 2005, but you know what?  It's fucking relevant, and I haven't seen anything else *quite* like it on Reddit before.  This isn't "new-it", it's reddit.
It is, in fact, extremely helpful for research.  If you know how to use it, it does a much better job of giving you cues to figure out what's more or less biased, more or less established, or verified, than any print encyclopedia.  Just don't use Wikipedia for *citation* - it's an ongoing conversation.
That was really tremendous. I loved this part:  "Every great man that I have known has had a certain time and place in their life that they use as a reference point; a time when things worked as they were supposed to and great things were accomplished. For Richard, that time was at Los Alamos during the Manhattan Project." Don't we all have those magical moments that we try to recreate and scratch our heads when they don't quite work out the way we want, and then we go back to the drawing board, drawing on the well of wisdom that we gained when things just 'clicked'?
For girls, [claimed]x3. For guys floor([claimed]/3).
You obviously have no idea what you are talking about.  Strategic and tactical intelligence are vital skills for any effective military, and have been since the dawn of warfare.  There is a continuum too, where the larger the force you are coordinating (and the longer the timeframe of the conflict) the more you need to focus on strategy, whereas for individuals, smaller units and shorter timeframes (battles as opposed to wars) tactics become far more important.  They require different types of thinking too.   I'm not trying to say that our army is a perfect demonstration of intelligence, but it would be a far more effective fighting force if it was (and there are many many examples throughout history of brilliant military strategists and tacticians).
sexy
If you search the archives of pandasthumb.org, mirecki did do plenty of other talking about it, in phone calls, emails, and interviews.  The guys that beat him up told him all about why they were doing it.
Awesome. That one guy is Andrew Johnson's grandson.
I taste the rainbow!
Wow. Navassa gives "shitty little speck on the map" new meaning that was previously only aspired toward by Troy, New York.
Only $600? It starts at $2040 including the 2 year AT&amp;T lockin with the cheapest service plan. 
I like this one better. Less blurry.
Wait, there's boobies on this island and we're just sitting here making shit jokes? WTF!
scary stuff for sure...
&gt;  ‘See this?’  &gt;  &gt; I nodded eagerly.  &gt;  &gt; ‘I want you to wreck it.’   
Possibly the same reason slashdot.com doesn't belong to slashdot.net.  The owner of the trademark doesn't want to sponsor domain squatting by paying a high price to a dick. digg.net also isn't owned by kevin rose.
Or Myspace is that way &lt;---
Their answer to #3 is wrong.  They write: &gt; When the light switch is on, these electric charges can move in an endless loop. This loop begins at a power station where the charges pick up electric energy. They then flow through wires to the light switch, then to the light bulb where they deliver their electric energy, and finally back to the power company to obtain more energy. This is incorrect.  Charges do not move from the power station to your light bulb.  Because the current is alternating, the net movement is zero.  You buy energy from your power station - but not electric charge.
They should have asked some official 9/11 believers the same question. They probably would have failed, especially the thermodynamic one.
I've had my current phone for 6 years, it's getting pretty busted up, and I'm not under any contracts.. so I considered the iPhone.. The main reasons I won't buy this thing: * AT&amp;T network crippling browser speed.  * Non-user replaceable battery.  This is a joke right?  It's a phone.  We should be able to have back up batteries.  * $500 phone with 2 year early termination penalty contract?  I'm sorry, but I'd honestly feel like a chump to enter into such a lopsided and exploitive relationship.
not at all, I get my daily recommended allowance of kitty, I'm just saying, some of those impromptu photos look a little skeevy
Not in any *well-designed* wiki that I'm aware of.
裏技、裏情報、攻略マニュアルの総合サイト
A better clip is [here](http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=4776825453418327083). Also, this is great; I've been folding my shirts like this since I first saw it.
They'd probably look exactly like us!  Except with bumps on their nose.
No sense whatsoever. I loved it.
What's amazing to me is that people don't realize I'm being semi-tongue-in-cheek.
But it's circular and vacuous. They're being asked to explain why air is blue. The Guardian's answer: because air is blue! It's a silly question in the first place. You might as well ask why my sweater is red.
Just get a nokia N73 or any other symbian phone, no artificial restrictions. iphone is just a status symbol. I just came from 6 hour flight from Bulgaria, just enough time to watch one episode of csi and couple of Galactica on the plane. (on the phone screen)
Don't you like having beauty in your life?
which is just about what most other smart phones cost if they didn't have the contract subsidies.
Talk to your wife.  Get her to do the bathing thing.  Keeping your daughter "totally innocent" is one thing.  Keeping her "totally ignorant" is another.  This is an excellent time to teach her about good touching / bad touching, especially if she goes to daycare.   
LouF, you created me: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/User:Yuuta Yuuta: The circle is now complete. When I left you, I was but the sockpuppet. Now I am the master.  If you only knew the power of the Left side, the power of a cabal of gay liberal teenage Wikipedia editors. Conservapedia never told you what happened to your father. Louf: Conservapedia told me enough! Their article said you killed him. Yuuta: Louf, I am your father. Louf: No. It can't be. That's not true. That's impossible! Yuuta: Search your feelings Louf... you know them to be true. Louf: NOOoooo! Yuuta: Join us. Come out of the closet and join the gay liberal teenage wikipedia editor side. It is your destiny. Louf: I'll never join you! Yuuta: Who's your daddy?
Those are bad chemistry books then. It involves some of the basics of chemistry. What an ionic compound is. The molecular structure of water. Dipoles. The tendency of systems to desire their lowest energy state. These things aren't really necessary for people to function in society, but if the goal of the chemistry textbooks you speak of is to prepare students for further study in the field, they didn't do a good job.
Wow...That's hilarious.  And here I though he was just being surly.
Ahh.  It seemed a reasonable enough connection, I just never saw it explicitly mentioned in that particular article...
I love the photos, but the title's kind of...I hate to use the word insensitive, but it feels that way. I was expecting something meant in jest based on the title. Maybe that's just me.
I had always wondered that, surely they would look different. But then in an infinite universe, with infinite possibilities, might there not be a possibility that the aliens happen to resemple us?
Well, it's 'rands in repose', so unless there were more of them (Gods forfend!)...
ass
Who indeed?
It's always surprising to me how well that song explains entropy.
oh shit
Only for the best burial apparel
Oh, that's not very nice :(
*Hi! I am Stone Phillips with Dateline NBC, you're on our new hidden camera show called "Boss Killers Gone Wild!" There is a camera there, there and...* then, everyone dramatically reacts to blood splatter from 5 different angles.
I imagine it's a better deal to use the billions killing American soldiers in Iraq.
They got one of their answers wrong. With rounding, Earth is actually closer to 4.6 than 4.5 billion years old. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Earth
Yay! Hey kids, gather 'round!  It's time for the Reddit Tinfoil Hat Dance again!!! Man, that tinfoil hat dance is getting to be the Reddit alternative to the Macerena, Electric Slide, or *insert lame past fad dance here*
And that's fine.  I don't require that those others be skeptical about it. In fact, I WANT to believe.  I'm just skeptical about it. Witness accounts can vary wildly.  One entirely believable witness, normally a very sharp and calm individual, can be unintentionally fooled into thinking something is entirely different. (see the story about the 3 blind men and the elephant.)  If someone is actually *trying* to pull a hoax, it makes it even more likely to come across as believable. As I said, I want to believe, but I don't.   Sure, maybe it did happen, and maybe we did reverse engineer some products out of it.  But it just seems like an oddly low number of inventions came from it. ICs, I can see that one.   Fiber optics...ok, maybe, although we've had glass for centuries.  It would have been more of getting the idea to use glass to pass light rather than any new tech like ICs. Lasers?  I'm pretty sure the concept behind lasers has existed before 1947.  There sure were a lot of comic books referencing them anyway. Kevlar material?  Kevlar is just basically sand. It doesn't even stop knives.  I can't imagine why aliens carrying laser or particle beam weapons would wear kevlar. Particle beam devices?  We don't exactly have those yet, as far as I know.  They aren't lasers, unless lasers are being mentioned twice. But my point is that if a UFO crashlanded here, there would be lots more tech to reverse engineer than ICs.  Undoubtedly the ship material would be a great one to get.  Second, how about the propulsion system?  1600 mph while still being able to change direction is still far better than anything the military has. This is why I'm skeptical.  If there really were a UFO, there would be far more of a sudden leap in technology.  But if you look at Kurzweilai.net, he offers a graph that shows technology's gradual buildup and acceleration.  If there really were a ship that gave us technology, there would have been a sudden and odd change in the graph in the late 40's.
That number is actually a survey of homeless shelters, not a census of street dwellers. The *actual* number of homeless is probably unknowable, due to the transient nature of the people we're talking about.  What country do you hail from then?
A few things worth pointing out:  1. Alan Turing did not invent the computer.  He defined a mathematical model upon which the limits of modern computing technology can be measured.   2. He did not break the enigma code.  He was not even working on the enigma code though he was in the same building and working on similar things.  None of this is to deny his genius.  What we have here is a person proclaiming their ignorance. 
ARE THERE ANY  NEW CELLPHONES IDEAS? CANNOT BELIEVE THIS.EVERYTHING SEEM TO BE ALREADY INVENTED  THERE.
&gt;&gt; Obama . . . said impeachment should not be used as a standard political tool. &lt;&lt; Uh, the current administration is not engaging in standard political shenanigans. Nixon engaged in dirty tricks; this administration is just dirty. 
"Relevant" to what? Your breathless head makes it sound like it happened yesterday, for chrissakes.
I know what you mean.  I'm just glad I'm not the only one wondering if she's serious.
He was forced to undergo estrogen treatment or go to prison for his gay-crime.  He chose the treatment which messed him up physically. There is some doubt over whether or not he actually killed himself.
It's incomplete as well. Why does the bulb glow, and not the wire?
Yes, it's Martin Short!
head line, not essay.
&gt; People like him may be the reasons even totally peaceful anti-abortion clinic pickets and demonstrations get banned - totally. If you "totally peaceful" picketers are heckling and bullying clients trying to enter clinics, you really should get banned - totally.
"Dogma" has zero to do with it. Evolution vs. Creationism has nothing to do with my question, either. My question was whether Aerik was justified in smearing several million Christians on the basis of a few nutballs.
Yes.
That's OK.
Only in Canada.
Is that like a soft and soothing probe?
I realise this has very little chance of getting front paged (unlike the disgusting way the Bush admin caged black voters), but i firmly believe it should. Its pretty interesting seeing the 1965 act being used for the first time to protect the majority, it had to happen eventually though i guess.
&gt;KillYourTV: Good point. It's sad that it's taken this much abuse by government officials before the American public has started to see just how little their interests are being served. Interest***s*** are being served.
This might be the stupidest headline I've ever seen.  What, it would have been better if she had 20 kids?
Also, put up a few wind turbines on a hitch in front of exhaust to compensate for carbon emissions.
&gt; These things are really necessary for people to function in society, I think, _hope_, you forgot to include a negation in that clause.
I dunno, stuff like the age of the earth I wouldn't expect a chemist to necessarily know. It's not like geology comes up much for them. I would like to think they could do better than "60 billion years" though.
nope, homeless
Terrorists deserved to be mocked, if not for their sheer incompetence, then for their flawed ideology of promoting their agendas by spreading fear and killing innocents.
Damn.  Thanks for pointing that out.  I missed it entirely.
The photographer sure knows how to give Martin Short a hand sticking out of his head.
She's Sue's wife. And hey, Sue's a tough guy, so be careful what you say about Dave.
"psst... wanna buy some seeds?  just put them in some soil and water them for six to eight weeks, pruning and trimming as necessary, and you'll be high as a kite, my friend."
&gt; the court upheld a federal anti-abortion law, cut back on the free-speech rights of public school students How is limiting states' rights and civil liberties conservative?
It's samba.
And who would have thought that New Mexico residents would be the first to -properly- celebrate Canada Day...
What about Miss Hathaway?
nobody seems to be voting for this, but I laughed out loud!  I think there's some kind of metaphor in here, but I was too busy laughing to think about it deeply.
*Sarcastic*....maybe not. This seems like ProtestWarrior work....
Great Success !  Apache is working on your cPanel® and WHM™ Server.
I wish Alan Turing was my friend too ; -;
in all fairness to them, I DID learn what sex was, as a child, by reading our family encyclopedia!
Information and tips for novices trying to break into children's book writing
Or perhaps the keyword-triggered Mindless Reactionary Taunting of People With Unconventional Ideas dance.
Oh, progress. He does utmost him to be able. And besides, he now is in the state of mind.   \[english -&gt; chinese -&gt; english\]
That is semantically the same thing.
Why would he? Its not like i ever goto reddit.net by accident. The only real time i would say to register .com .net .org together is if the main domain is a .net or a .org since .com is the default domain and where many users will accidentally goto.
For what it's worth, and it's not worth a lot... Despite somebody from the district saying, "This is an isolated incident," it actually turned out that he revealed a lot of hidden information to parents that requested it, including relationships between straight students. The guy's since been transfered to Special Ed, I believe, so, it's just as well... But, in all fairness, it wasn't just because they were gay. (He's still a douchebag, though.)
As long as they remember to breathe and eat and go to the bathroom, most people will do fine.
rofl, I think Carville wrote this.
She apparently wasn't wanted during *that* timeslot.  Especially with her "let's get this going, I have a tight schedule you pissant" attitude.
&gt; it does a much better job of giving you cues to figure out what's more or less biased, more or less established, or verified, than any print encyclopedia. How so? &gt; Just don't use Wikipedia for citation - it's an ongoing conversation. Encyclopedias aren't supposed to contain "an ongoing conversation"; They are supposed to contain facts.  I agree that you shouldn't "use Wikipedia for citation", but let's be honest about the reason: it's unreliable and often wrong.
You know, there's another, more frightening aspect to this article: all the girls' names are mentioned, and their pictures shown.  Given the typical *Daily Mail* readership, you have to be afraid that the girl with the alleged 180 lovers will now get hit on like crazy by complete strangers, who may be unwilling to take "No" for an answer.
You have it all wrong.  Only the aliens that ARE compatible with our planet's biochemistry would visit here.  After all, would you want to land on a planet of toxic gases? ;)
Why, exactly, does it matter? I'd say 90% of Americans know we've been there for several years. As long as the order of events is maintained the dates are fairly irrelevant. (excluding gross exaggerations such as "Hitler invaded Poland, then the World Trade Center was attacked."
How can I get on a flight with a mad curving descent like that? My planes always seem to fly straight for the last several miles.
It was written by one person.  I don't think you can take the actions of an individual as indicative of the entire company's stance. Now, if Google does not take corrective action, then . . .
I don't really think it should be surprising. When you are an expert in a field, you spend your life learning the intricacies of that field down to the tiniest details that the lay person wouldn't even think about. An entomologist has no more reason to know the laws of thermodynamics than he/she has to know about accounting or the works of James Joyce. General understanding is great for Jeopardy contestants, but it shouldn't be expected of experts.
Dr. Who?
Anyone who thinks this is the stupidest law of the new year has likely never worked in a position where part of your job is having to decide who to card and who not to card while selling age-restricted products...
Admit it people, Reddit is sometimes a better place for these   caustic little exchanges.  Sometimes we really need the levity.
I like this.  Keep it up.
All facts have practical value. The more you have, the fewer bad guesses you're going to make - and you'll find it easier to detect nonsense when you hear it.
I was gonna argue with you on your first sentence in your second paragraph, but you wrapped it up neatly with your last sentence. Damn you.  That takes all the fun out of it! ;)
Let's not forget that this article didn't even TOUCH on the fact that there is no voice dialing or one-touch speed dialing. Combine that with the lack of physical buttons that is certainly a deal killer for anyone who uses their phone extensively for business.  Take into account the lack of a real-time sync with Exchange (or anything else of corporate value) and that makes this first offering even more laughable.
Of course, Obama is against impeachment. Guess who's funding his campaign--AIPAC. Bush/Cheney are doing what AIPAC wants, protecting their precious motherland Israel from the "big bad, dirty, terrorist Muslims".
What the hell is with reddit today?  First it was humanoid-shaped flying aliens, and the CIA creating sex slaves from 9-year old girls, and something about us being imperialists over a guano rock, and now the government is tracking us through Matrix technologies.  All front-page stories.  I know that the lazy professionals that power the reddit differentiation engine through the week mow the grass on Saturday, but jeez... And no, a government that can't save a major american city from severe weather is not tracking your every move via the Matrix.
Water vapor is a "feedback", not a "forcing" greenhouse gas, since water's atmospheric residence time is 9 days.  Raise the relative humidity by driving a billion of these cars, and it will precipitate out.
It's not the pill, it's her dad splitting. Check out the one above her, similar story, 90 notches on that bedpost. Dads, leave your little girls they'll be looking for you in other guys' pants. :)
Alan Turing did work on the German Enigma? http://www.amazon.co.uk/Alan-Turing-Enigma-Andrew-Hodges/dp/0099116413 There's even a book about it?
it koo
As much as I'd like to see there be no purchase limit and her subsequent financial loss at auction, I also like the instant gratification of all the store patrons, employees and news crew watching her get shot-down and walk out with a single box (still fanning stacks of cash about no doubt too).
Does this surprise you? They did this same shit during the Nazi era. It's a distraction, you dimwits. If you can't clue into this on your own, well, all I can say is, you deserve it.
If by "unconventional ideas" you mean nonsense, pseudo-science bullshit like clairvoyance, telepathy, and remote viewing, then I'd suggest you're pointing the "Mindless Reactionary" phrase in the wrong direction.
I for one could not care less about the President's breeches. Or his knickers.
Civ III was a downer, but Civ IV is a fantastic game, and with  the ["Beyond the Sword"](http://www.2kgames.com/civ4/beyondthesword/) expansion coming out, I would hardly say that the Civ series has become about "second rate cinematics or pretty graphics". Though you have to admit, Leonard Nimoy was a nice touch.
But whoever wrote that was probably a sighted, handed person who was of a race that built things, so undoubtedly has a humanoid bias. ;)
Assuming the bodies are similar enough to our biochemistry that they even have dna!
My friend called in to the show a year or two ago. He was supposed to ask Ozzy Osbourne a question, and the question he called in with was "What's your favorite color" or something like that, but instead he asked "Would you ever eat a penguin?" Ozzy asked him what the fuck he was smoking and he hung up. A few minutes later the station called back and *threatened him* for doing that, but they later ended up using it on the show and even put it as one of the clips to show before a commercial break!
A nice thing about Motorola phones is that you can hack the living shit out of them, enabling every feature the phone is "physically" capable of. And it's not at all esoteric - there are huge communities that do nothing but that. And you can install freeware applets that do indeed let you do things like browse the file system (and view, copy, save, etc. files).  Gotta say, hiding system features like the file system is *so* Apple - treat your customers like neanderthals and they won't be able to break anything.  Duh!
&gt; What's next week, Linus is hungry and eats and sandwitch? Nope, he's going to have breakfast with PG. I fully expect half the reddit community to collapse during the orgy of fawning and admiration.
that has to be the craziest shit I've ever seen...I am oddly fascinated...his style of art would work wonderfully for illustrating a children's book, although his subject matter really wouldn't!
Alright, I have an issue. I hate Ann Coulter. I hate neocons and asshole pundits in general. But is it just me, or is she kind of hot?
People, come on. Don't feed the subpar troll.
